NOTE: early draft of this prequel chapter to jus algorithmi covering poltiical progression and online surveillance 

# The Architecture of Capture: How a Memo, a Loophole, and a Market Built the Machine That Ate Democracy

### A Prequel to *Jus Algoritmi: The New Digital Homo Sacer and Democracy’s Devastating Policy Debt*

-----

**Author’s Note:**

*“Jus Algoritmi” traces the collapse of the public and private sphere through three stages — the cubicle, the profile, and the algorithm in the bedroom — and documents how the citizen was dissolved into the project, how the homo sacer was produced by algorithmic means, and how policy debt compounds until the democratic system can no longer name the subject it governs. That essay begins in the middle. It begins with the collapse already underway.*

*This chapter is the prequel. It goes back to the origin and asks: who built the architecture? How did the regulatory vacuum that allowed data brokers to sell your location to police without a warrant come to exist? How did the institutional capture that prevents Congress from legislating on AI governance become structural rather than incidental? How did the companies that now function as the sovereign algorithm come to occupy that position unchallenged?*

*The digital citizen described in “Jus Algoritmi” — the subject who exists simultaneously in physical and algorithmic space, whose identity is constituted in part by data flows, whose agency is shaped by systems designed to optimize rather than liberate, and whose rights were written for a person who no longer exists in the form the law imagines — did not appear from nowhere. That citizen was produced by an architecture. The architecture has a history, and the history has names on it.*

*What follows is that history. It begins with an eight-page memo and ends with a 22-point manifesto posted to X with 32 million views. Between them lies the entire blueprint of the machine.*

-----

## I. The Memo as Origin Point

On August 23, 1971, Lewis F. Powell Jr. — a corporate attorney, a board member of Philip Morris, a former president of the American Bar Association, and a man who had spent his career in the White male social and corporate elite of Richmond, Virginia — mailed a confidential memorandum to his friend Eugene B. Sydnor Jr., chairman of the Education Committee of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. The memo was titled “Attack on American Free Enterprise System.” It was eight pages long.

Two months later, on October 22, 1971, President Richard Nixon nominated Powell to the Supreme Court. The memo was not disclosed to the Senate during his confirmation proceedings. The secret report was dated August 23, 1971. Less than six months after delivering the document that would reshape American power for half a century, Powell was sworn in as an Associate Justice on January 7, 1972.

Powell’s argument was straightforward in its diagnosis and sweeping in its prescription. The American economic system, he wrote, was under broad attack — not merely from extremists of the left but from “perfectly respectable elements of society”: the college campus, the pulpit, the media, the intellectual and literary journals, the arts and sciences, and from politicians. He identified consumer advocate Ralph Nader as the chief antagonist of American business. Powell’s reaction was based in part on Nader’s 1965 exposé on General Motors, *Unsafe at Any Speed*, which put a focus on the auto industry putting profit ahead of safety and triggered the American consumer movement. Powell saw this as an undermining of the power of private business and a step toward socialism. His experiences as a corporate lawyer and a director on the board of Philip Morris from 1964 until his appointment to the Supreme Court made him a champion of the tobacco industry who railed against the growing scientific evidence linking smoking and cancer.

The turbulence of the 1960s was broadly distressing to America’s corporate elite. The civil rights movement disrupted Jim Crow across the South, drawing out and exposing to the nation the racist violence that had long enforced the social and legal norm of segregation and upsetting America’s all-White corporate suites and boardrooms. Anti-war protesters derided Dow Chemical Company’s manufacture of napalm and scorned the entire military-industrial complex. Women’s rights protesters challenged all-male corporate management structures. The environmental movement protested chemical leaks, toxic products, and the poisons belching from corporate smokestacks. Public health groups began linking the tobacco industry to deadly illnesses and lead paint companies to brain damage in children.

Environmental awareness and pressure on corporate polluters had reached a new peak in the months before the Powell memo was written. In January 1970, President Nixon signed the National Environmental Policy Act. Massive Earth Day events took place across the country. By early July, Nixon signed an executive order creating the Environmental Protection Agency. Tough new amendments to the Clean Air Act followed in December 1970. By April 1971, the EPA announced the first air pollution standards. Lead paint was soon regulated for the first time. DDT was banned for agricultural use in 1972.

The overall tone of Powell’s memo reflected a widespread sense of crisis among elites in the business and political communities. His opening declaration was stark: “No thoughtful person can question that the American economic system is under broad attack.” He identified threats coming from “the college campus, the pulpit, the media, the intellectual and literary journals, the arts and sciences, and from politicians.” He argued that the attacks were coming not just from a few “extremists of the left” but also — and most alarmingly — from “perfectly respectable elements of society,” including leading intellectuals, the media, and politicians.

Powell’s response was not a single campaign but an ecosystem — a multi-decade, multi-institutional project to capture the commanding heights of American public life. His strategic pillars were clear and specific:

**Capture universities.** Powell called for the creation of a permanent intellectual infrastructure: a “faculty of scholars” who could be deployed to campuses and against hostile academic voices. He urged the Chamber to fund scholars, speakers, and programs that championed free markets. He recognized that universities were, in his view, indoctrinating students with anti-capitalist ideas. He believed it vital to ensure that future generations understood that capitalism fueled innovation and opportunity.

**Reshape media narratives.** Powell advocated “constant surveillance” of national television networks, arguing that this applied “not merely to so-called educational programs (such as ‘Selling of the Pentagon’), but to the daily ‘news analysis’ which so often includes the most insidious type of criticism of the enterprise system.” He noted that “whether this criticism results from hostility or economic ignorance, the result is the gradual erosion of confidence in ‘business’ and free enterprise.” He urged the Chamber to insist on the right to be heard, on “equal time,” and to deploy “whatever degree of pressure — publicly and privately — may be necessary.” He emphasized that it was “especially important for the Chamber’s ‘faculty of scholars’ to publish,” noting that “one of the keys to the success of the liberal and leftist faculty members has been their passion for ‘publication’ and ‘lecturing.’”

**Pack the courts.** Powell identified the judiciary as “perhaps the most important instrument for social, economic, and political change.” He cited the ACLU as a liberal entity that had experience promoting the appointment of judges and wanted to see a similarly equipped conservative organization take up the cause on behalf of business. He wrote: “Under our constitutional system, especially with an activist-minded Supreme Court, the judiciary may be the most important instrument for social, economic, and political change.”

**Build permanent lobbying infrastructure.** In his section titled “The Neglected Political Arena,” Powell recommended using political influence to stem “the stampedes by politicians to support any legislation related to ‘consumerism’ or to the ‘environment.’” He placed the word “environment” in derogatory quotation marks. He wrote that political power “is necessary; it must be assiduously cultivated; and when necessary, it must be used aggressively and with determination — without embarrassment and without the reluctance which has been so characteristic of American business.” This would be “a long road,” Powell warned, “and not for the fainthearted.”

Powell recognized that “the entire program” required an active and aggressive media presence and the utmost care in brand management. He understood that long-term, lasting change required appealing to the hearts and minds of the public at large. He advised that all channels of communication had “to meet the most exacting standards of accuracy and professional excellence” so that the views they advocated would carry weight.

Powell emphasized the importance of strengthening institutions like the U.S. Chamber — which represented the interests of the broader business community, and therefore was key to creating a united front. He argued that “strength lies in organization, in careful long-range planning and implementation, in consistency of action over an indefinite period of years, in the scale of financing available only through joint effort, and in the political power available only through united action.”

The memo was delivered to a friend at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. From there, it quietly began circulating among the country’s most powerful business leaders. Initially it was viewed and praised by only a select few within the Chamber. That changed on September 28 and 29, 1972, when the leaked document was the topic of negative treatment in syndicated newspaper columnist Jack Anderson’s Washington Merry-Go-Round. With quotations now public, the Chamber published it in full in its newsletter, *Washington Report*.

The implementation was immediate and systematic.

In March 1973, the Chamber of Commerce’s Public Affairs Committee convened a three-day conference at Disney World’s Polynesian Resort billed as the first gathering of the “Task Force on the Powell Memorandum.” The conference agenda mirrored the memo’s recommendations. Sessions focused on “enhancing the image of business,” strategies for political action, and creating a long-term framework to expand corporate influence — particularly how “the Chamber and business community can develop more political clout.” The task force divided into subcommittees, each focused on a core tenet of the memo: education, communications, political action, and judicial action. They were encouraged to think big, with instructions to “blue sky” their ideas beyond the Powell Memo’s already ambitious scope. They recognized that this was a long game, requiring not just money but sustained, strategic planning. By November 1974, the Committee on Business Overview — the permanent group born from the Powell Memo Task Force — had been hard at work for over a year, implementing the memo’s recommendations.

The results were staggering in scope and durability. What began as a response to perceived regulatory overreach became a blueprint for culture change that favored resistance to the federal government and long-term investment in changing the political direction of the country:

Within a decade of the memo’s release, the number of companies with public affairs offices in Washington increased from 100 to over 500. The number of companies with registered lobbyists rose from 175 to nearly 2,500. In 1971, there were only 176 companies in Washington, D.C. By 1980, there were 2,445 companies, 9,000 lobbyists, and 60,000 trade association employees.

The Heritage Foundation was established in 1973, funded initially by seed money from the Coors brewing family and Richard Mellon Scaife’s publishing enterprise. The Powell Memo precipitated an explosion in the growth of U.S. think tanks, and Heritage marked the birth of a new type of politically aggressive and openly ideological “expert” organization. The Cato Institute followed. The American Enterprise Institute was revitalized. Together with over eighty large non-profit organizations — funded by a gaggle of right-wing family foundations and wealthy individuals to the tune of $400 million a year — they formed what analyst Rob Stein called “the Big 80,” a conservative political movement that achieved a hammerlock on every aspect of federal government.

The Federalist Society, founded in 1982, began the systematic project of reshaping the federal judiciary. Powell himself had paved the doctrinal ground: his opinion in *First National Bank of Boston v. Bellotti* shifted the direction of First Amendment law by declaring that corporate financial influence of elections by independent expenditures should be protected with the same vigor as individual speech. This doctrinal seed grew, through decades of Federalist Society-cultivated judges and justices, into the Roberts Court’s decision in *Citizens United v. Federal Election Commission* — which broke radical new ground by striking down the edifice of campaign finance laws. The decades-long drive to rethink legal doctrines and ultimately strike down campaign finance laws continues apace.

The views of industry-sponsored groups — thirty-six of them documented in *Masks of Deception: Corporate Front Groups in America* — are regularly reported in the press as the views of citizen advocates. The sole reason for their existence is to convince the public that the corporate interest is the public interest and that labor, health, and the environment are “special” interests. The top funders of such groups include Dow Chemical, Exxon, Chevron USA, Mobil, DuPont, Ford, Philip Morris, Pfizer, Anheuser-Busch, Monsanto, Procter & Gamble, Phillips Petroleum, AT&T, and Arco.

By the close of the 1970s, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce had been transformed from a cautious, passive business group into a politically aggressive and ideologically driven machine, rebuilt to carry out the “careful long-range planning and implementation” Powell had urged. It became part of the broader vision he had imagined: an alliance of business interests and conservative political groups, united in opposition to the regulatory state and working together as a social movement for capitalism. Measured in money spent, the Chamber became the most powerful lobby in Washington — $770.6 million since 1998, over three times the amount spent by the next-largest spender, General Electric. The Chamber reinforced its lobbying power by becoming one of the largest conduits of election-related “independent expenditures,” spending over $32.8 million on federal elections in 2010. It sponsors the Institute for Legal Reform, which has spearheaded the campaign for tort “reform” — making it more difficult for average people who have been injured, assaulted, or harmed to sue the responsible corporations. Along with well over a dozen legal foundations, the Chamber has helped shape the powerful “business civil liberties” movement that has been a driving force behind *Citizens United* and other judicial actions that have handcuffed regulators and prevented Congress from putting common-sense checks on corporate power.

Charles Koch read the memo and concluded it didn’t go far enough. In a speech to the Institute for Humane Studies, which he had taken over in the early 1970s, Koch said the Powell memo didn’t go far enough because it did not urge specific restrictions on money being given to universities. He asserted that Powell was wrong in assuming that most businesses believe in “free enterprise” because Koch’s definition of that term was even narrower: he rejected the idea of equal opportunity laws and wage rules and health and safety laws, and framed them as inherently anti-capitalist, anti-free-market. He didn’t believe the business community was actually committed to free enterprise because it was willing to go along with common-sense regulations that the people wanted. Koch’s agenda has captured the Republican Party when it comes to business deregulation. As journalist Nancy MacLean documented, the campaign amounted to a sustained effort to “save capitalism from democracy — permanently.”

Lisa Graves, a researcher who studied the memo’s impact, stated: “This document was not a product of the democratic process, but it has had a profound impact on our process by pushing forward a structure for how corporations can exert more influence on American life. That came in response to a brief period in U.S.” history when regulatory and consumer protections were expanding.

As Jane Mayer and others documented, the strategy worked all too well: megacorporations now enjoy fewer regulations, lower taxes, more lobbyists, more businesspeople in power, and the ability to impede policy perceived as hurting their bottom line, whether that be related to climate protections or health care reform. A right-wing dark money network, financed over the decades by magnates from Bryce Harlow to Richard Mellon Scaife to Joseph Coors, funded think tanks, media outlets and writers, college programs, legal organizations, and politicians dedicated to advancing pro-business causes.

Powell later dismissed the memo as something he had written in his free time as a favor to a friend, claiming it had little impact. Yet its influence is undeniable. It played a key role in reshaping the balance of power in the United States, leaving a lasting impact on media, education, government policy, and most critically, the courts. The memo is both credited as having “changed America” and remains the single most requested document in the Lewis F. Powell Jr. Papers.

Senator Sheldon Whitehouse, in his “Scheme” series of Senate floor speeches, placed the memo at the origin of what he described as a long-running, right-wing scheme to capture the Supreme Court through dark money. The Alliance for Justice’s 1993 report *Justice for Sale* mentioned it prominently. The case for the memo being a seminal document in the neoconservative movement was made in John B. Judis’s 2000 book *The Paradox of American Democracy*. Because it signaled the beginning of a major shift in American business culture, political power, and law, the Powell memo essentially marks the beginning of the business community’s multi-decade collective takeover of the most important institutions of public opinion and democratic decision-making. At the very least, it is the first place where this broad agenda was compiled in one document.

More than 50 years after Powell’s memo, Project 2025 — a 900-page manual for transforming the executive branch, spearheaded by the Heritage Foundation, the same organization born from Powell’s vision — represents the culmination of his institutional capture strategy. The administrative state comprises thousands of civil servants who make daily decisions about regulations, enforcement, and policy implementation. Most Americans cannot name these agencies, yet they profoundly shape everyday life. Conservatives began viewing the administrative state as the true battlefield. The logic was simple: if laws cannot be repealed, defund or capture the agencies that enforce them. If legislation cannot pass, reinterpret existing laws through friendlier courts.

The critical throughline to surveillance: Powell’s strategy was about ensuring that corporate interests could operate with minimal government oversight. The result was a regulatory environment where corporations — including data brokers — could grow largely unchecked, while the state simultaneously gained access to the data those corporations harvested. Powell did not call for surveillance of citizens. He called for “constant surveillance” of media and textbooks — the institutional spaces where public opinion was formed. His project was to ensure that those spaces produced opinion favorable to corporate interests. The irony that would take fifty years to fully materialize is that the institutional architecture he built — the deregulated marketplace, the captured judiciary, the weakened regulatory agencies — would create the precise conditions under which a surveillance apparatus emerged that made his original project look quaint. Powell wanted to monitor television. His heirs built a system that monitors everyone, all the time, and sells the data to the government without a warrant.

The Powell Memo’s most consequential legacy is not any single institution it produced. It is the ecosystem — the flywheel of compounding institutional power. A Heritage Foundation policy paper becomes a Federalist Society legal brief becomes a Supreme Court opinion becomes a media talking point becomes a campaign contribution becomes a legislative outcome. Each component reinforces the others. Each year’s investment compounds into the next year’s capacity. The through-line is direct, documented, and unbroken.

-----

## II. The Data Broker Loophole: Where Corporate Capture Meets Surveillance

The absence of comprehensive federal privacy law in the United States is the downstream product of the regulatory vacuum that Powell’s institutional project created and sustained across five decades. The data broker industry is the bastard child of that deregulatory project: a $250+ billion industry that exists in the gap between what the Fourth Amendment was meant to protect and what corporate lobbying has carved out.

The contrast with the European Union is foundational. The EU’s General Data Protection Regulation, implemented in 2018, requires explicit and informed consent before personal data is collected. It applies to any entity that processes personal data in the context of activities in the EU or that targets EU individuals — without revenue thresholds, without processing thresholds, without broker thresholds. There is no revenue threshold, processing threshold, or broker threshold. Violations carry administrative fines of up to €20 million or 4% of total worldwide annual turnover, whichever is higher.

The United States does not have a single, comprehensive federal data privacy law. Instead, data privacy regulations are a combination of sector-specific and state-level laws that govern how personal data is collected, processed, and shared. These regulations vary in scope and enforcement and often focus on specific industries such as healthcare, finance, and education. As of 2026, only four states — California, Oregon, Texas, and Vermont — require data brokers to register with state agencies and disclose their activities. Data brokers are third-party entities that purchase personal data, often unbeknownst to the individuals whose data is being traded. All data brokers that process data not collected directly from the data subjects themselves now have to register with these four states. However, it is not exactly straightforward for data subjects to delete their information from these brokers’ databases.

The Consumer Financial Protection Bureau proposed a rule on December 3, 2024, to limit the sale of key personal information — such as Social Security numbers and phone numbers — under its interpretation of the Fair Credit Reporting Act. The proposal was explicitly designed to counter threats of fraud, stalking, espionage, identity theft, and surveillance, including risks posed to public officials, military personnel, and survivors of domestic violence. However, the CFPB ultimately concluded that such a rule was “not necessary or appropriate at this time,” citing inconsistencies with its current interpretation of the FCRA.

In the EU, explicit and informed consent is required from individuals before their data is collected. However, in the United States, for the states that have privacy laws to date, in most cases personal data can be collected and used without needing to obtain prior consent, unless the data subject is a child. The main legal requirement is that data subjects be informed about data processing and their rights. The CCPA provides the chance to opt out as opposed to the GDPR’s specific need to opt in. The consequences of noncompliance reflect the gap: CCPA violators face civil penalties of up to $7,500 per intentional violation. The GDPR’s penalties reach into the billions. True consent to disclosure involves clear and voluntary agreement, in which consumers understand what will be collected and how it will be used. This is generally not mandated in the U.S.

And at the center of this patchwork is the gap that matters most: there is no federal law prohibiting law enforcement agencies from purchasing data that they would otherwise need a warrant to obtain.

A whole industry of data brokers buys up vast quantities of electronic information from cell phone apps and web browsers and sells it to advertisers who use that data to target ads. The same industry also sells that data, including bulk cell phone location data, to police departments and federal government agencies in ways that can reveal intimate details about Americans without a warrant.

The Supreme Court’s 2018 decision in *Carpenter v. United States* held that police need a warrant to obtain historical cell-site location information — the data generated as a cell phone automatically connects to nearby cell towers. The Court recognized that tracking a person’s movements over time is extremely invasive, that individuals have a reasonable expectation of privacy when it comes to the “all-encompassing record” of their whereabouts. This type of data, the Court wrote, gave the government “near perfect surveillance and allows it to travel back in time to retrace a person’s whereabouts, subject only to the five-year retention policies of most wireless carriers.” The Court held that Americans have a privacy right to their historical cell phone data since location information is highly revealing, and that if law enforcement wants to obtain location information on a particular individual for seven days or more, it must have a warrant.

Nevertheless, several government agencies have argued that the *Carpenter* decision applies only to the specific type of location data at issue in that case — historical cell-site location information — and that Fourth Amendment protections apply only when the government compels companies to disclose information, not when private companies sell or voluntarily disclose information to law enforcement. Based on these purported distinctions, agencies are continuing to purchase cell phone location data — without a warrant or any other legal process — in large volumes. The Supreme Court presumably will clarify *Carpenter*‘s applicability in due time, but for now, government agencies are relying heavily on data purchases to sidestep the Fourth Amendment’s central safeguard against abusive policing: the requirement that police obtain a warrant from a judge before invading a reasonable expectation of privacy.

The government’s position is that buying data is constitutionally different from seizing it. The practical effect is the same: your movements are tracked, your associations are mapped, your life is rendered transparent to the state — but no judge was asked, no warrant was issued, and no probable cause was established.

Unlike private entities, government agencies may purchase personal data to further their exercise of coercive powers, including the ability to deport, arrest, incarcerate, or even use lethal force. Unfettered government access to personal data without judicial or legislative oversight can exacerbate existing biases in law enforcement and intelligence practices, permitting speculative investigations on the basis of constitutionally protected categories and the targeting of marginalized communities. Evidence of this phenomenon abounds, from the Defense Department purchasing location data collected from prayer apps to monitor Muslim communities to police departments purchasing information to track racial justice protesters.

Among the main purveyors in this surveillance capitalism ecosystem are data brokers — companies that collect, assemble, and analyze personal information to create detailed profiles of individuals, which they then sell. Although most of these companies are not household names, they serve an ever-growing demand; the industry pulled in more than $250 billion in 2022. Data brokers collect information from various sources. They pay app developers to install code that siphons users’ data, including location information. They use cookies or other web trackers to capture online activity. They scrape information from public-facing sites, including social media platforms, often in violation of those platforms’ terms of service. They also collect information from public records and purchase data from a wide range of companies that collect and maintain personal information, including app developers, internet service providers, car manufacturers, advertisers, utility companies, supermarkets, and others.

**Local police and Fog Data Science.** A Virginia-based company called Fog Data Science sells a service that it bills as allowing police to see where a person was at any point in time over the past several years. This surveillance includes not only possible crime scenes but also homes, churches, workplaces, health clinics, or anywhere else. The data is collected and passed through a chain of businesses before ending up with law enforcement. First, personal location data is gathered via thousands of common apps that people use on Android and iOS phones, that people install for various purposes and may not suspect are gathering and sharing that information. Fog Data Science claims it collects 15 billion sets of data points daily from 250 million U.S. devices every month sourced from “tens of thousands” of mobile apps with tracking code included.

An investigation by the Electronic Frontier Foundation — conducted by a team of EFF experts led by Staff Technologist Bennett Cyphers, taking several months and more than 100 public records requests — uncovered a massive surveillance operation. EFF discovered that Fog has past or current contracts with at least 18 local, state, and federal law enforcement clients, while other agencies accepted free trials. Troublingly, records show Fog and some police agencies didn’t believe this surveillance implicated people’s Fourth Amendment rights and so they didn’t obtain a warrant before searching through people’s location data. And glaringly absent from the public records EFF received were any documents establishing policies or other limits about when and how police could and should deploy this massive digital dragnet.

Among the findings: In Chino, California, police used Fog’s service to do massive sweeps determining who was near minor theft and burglary scenes. In a rural Missouri murder investigation, Fog’s service was used to track a babysitter who was never a suspect — police built an extensive profile of her movements and activities using purchased data, only to find out later through witness testimony that the victim’s wife was responsible. In Greensboro, North Carolina, a crime analysis supervisor raised red flags about its constitutionality and later quit after his warnings were ignored. And in all these places and many more, police never seemed to set any rules for when and how this massive digital dragnet should or shouldn’t be used.

Fog sells subscriptions to its Fog Reveal search engine and it does not require law enforcement to obtain a warrant or subpoena before searching for and buying information from it. This gives police an easy way to pull up location records for a device, and track and identify the device owner from their home address and place of work — or, really, anywhere else they have visited with their cellphone. Fog’s subscription costs less than $10,000 — mass surveillance on a municipal budget.

EFF investigative researcher Beryl Lipton stated: “Police departments of all sizes have been using a system that stores and makes searchable the historical locations of individuals. This means that they could identify the phones — and, by extension, the people — that have been at a protest, a reproductive health center, a place of worship, or other locations and track them to the places they live. This violates our constitutional rights, especially when police do it without a warrant.”

Location records from brokers are typically unlinked to a device owner’s name. But tools exist that help law enforcement track where a device has gone, where it spends every night and where it goes during working hours, as EFF senior staff technologist Bill Budington noted. Despite claims by Fog and other data brokers that the information they sell doesn’t contain personally identifiable information because it’s limited to timestamps, location coordinates, and random unique identifiers, it doesn’t take too much police work to link this supposedly anonymized data to actual people. In post-*Roe* America, this means that law enforcement can bypass warrants for Google Maps queries to build a case against an individual seeking an abortion in a state where the procedure is now illegal.

**Federal agencies.** U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement began purchasing access to cell phone users’ digital location data through a data brokerage company called Venntel in 2018. The data had been collected from popular cell phone apps, including weather, shopping, and video game apps. ICE used Venntel’s service to track the movements of cell phone users in areas near the United States’ southern border. At one point, ICE discovered that cell phones were moving back and forth across a closed portion of the border in a straight line. They eventually determined that the phones were traveling through what was likely an underground smuggling tunnel that ran from a private home in Mexico to a closed Kentucky Fried Chicken restaurant in San Luis, Arizona. ICE passed this information to the local police department, which made an apparently pretextual traffic stop of Ivan Lopez, the KFC’s owner, finding large quantities of drugs.

The San Luis police kept any mention of the cell phone tracking out of their records and initially attributed their traffic stop of Lopez to an “equipment violation.” This is not abnormal. Government agents often obscure their purchases of constitutionally protected information by recreating the purchased information through more traditional and lawful means, like traffic stops. This process, though successful, raises obvious concerns about pervasive surveillance, deception, and the avoidance of public scrutiny. And, as with almost any surveillance technique, the innocent as well as the guilty have their lives scrutinized by the police.

These tracking companies hide from any public exposure or notice. The nonpublic nature of this surveillance places it far outside the scope of Fourth Amendment case law indicating that police officers can usually engage in lawful conduct that members of the public might undertake. Supreme Court case law generally requires a surveillance practice to not only be available to the public but also be widely used before its public nature eliminates Fourth Amendment protections. In *Kyllo v. United States*, the Supreme Court held that police needed a warrant before using infrared heat cameras to surveil a suspect’s house, even though these cameras were readily available to the public.

The online magazine Motherboard revealed that a data broker named X-Mode compiled geolocation data from a popular Muslim prayer app (Muslim Pro) and a Muslim dating app (Muslim Mingle), then sold this extremely sensitive data to the U.S. military through defense contractors. The Department of Homeland Security, ICE, and Customs and Border Protection used a commercial database from Venntel Inc. to obtain user location data to detect undocumented immigrants and monitor cell phone activity along the border. This location information — combined with other surveillance tools — was used to track, arrest, and even deport immigrants across the country. The U.S. Internal Revenue Service partnered with Venntel to identify and monitor potential criminal suspects in money-laundering, cyber, drug, and organized crime cases.

News reports indicate that the FBI, Secret Service, and Department of Defense have acquired smartphone location data without a warrant. Defense contractors purchased location data from popular Muslim prayer and Qur’an apps and dating apps. Several members of Congress made official inquiries into how this data has been utilized. Cell phone data was allegedly used to track Black Lives Matter protesters over the summer of 2020. Though it is uncertain exactly how cell phone data informed the FBI’s response to the protests, it is notable that the agency renegotiated its purchase contract with a data broker around the time of the demonstrations. The use of purchased data to target religious groups and protesters emphasizes the critical importance of the Fourth Amendment in protecting against discriminatory policing practices. It also underscores the chilling effect unrestricted surveillance has on other civil liberties, including religious freedom and the right to dissent.

Some police departments have attempted to circumvent bans on their use of facial recognition by purchasing facial recognition search results from third-party vendors.

**The legislative landscape.** Montana became the first state to close the data broker loophole for law enforcement in May 2025, with SB 282 preventing law enforcement from purchasing citizens’ data from data brokers when ordinarily they would need a warrant to access such information.

California Governor Gavin Newsom signed SB 361 into law on October 28, 2025, expanding the state’s data broker oversight.

Texas’s data broker registration law went into effect in March 2024. In June 2024, the Texas Attorney General’s Office sent letters to more than 100 companies notifying them of registration requirements. In December 2024, the AG followed up with six violation notices to companies that still hadn’t registered. The California Privacy Protection Agency similarly issued enforcement actions against two companies in November 2024 that failed to register.

The Protecting Americans’ Data from Foreign Adversaries Act of 2024 (PADFA) prohibits data brokers from selling personally identifiable sensitive data to certain foreign adversary countries — China, North Korea, Russia, and Iran — or to entities controlled by those countries. The law went into effect in June 2024. The Department of Justice issued a final rule at the end of 2024 that restricts and regulates additional foreign personal data transactions, with strict prohibitions on data brokerage defined more broadly than under PADFA.

In 2024, the FTC settled with two data brokers over allegations that the companies collected, retained, and sold consumers’ precise location data associated with “sensitive” locations without adequately verifying consumers’ consent.

At the federal level, the bipartisan Fourth Amendment Is Not For Sale Act would prohibit law enforcement and intelligence agencies from purchasing certain sensitive information from third-party sellers, including geolocation information, communications-related information protected under the Electronic Communications Privacy Act, and information obtained through illegitimate scraping practices. Under the bill, there are exceptions for emergencies, and agencies would still be able to obtain information using a warrant, court order, or subpoena. In 2024, a bipartisan majority in the U.S. House passed the Act. Several pieces of legislation that address the data broker loophole have support, including the Government Surveillance Reform Act, the SAFE Act, and the Protect Liberty and End Warrantless Surveillance Act.

Over 130 civil society organizations signed a letter urging Congress to include closing the data broker loophole in FISA 702 reauthorization, citing the “unprecedented expansion of warrantless mass surveillance that is sweeping up the private information of communities across America” and the potential for the loophole to be used “to supercharge AI-powered surveillance.”

When Senator Ron Wyden asked FBI Director Kash Patel in early 2026 if he would commit to not buying Americans’ location data, Patel declined, saying the FBI “uses all tools” and “we do purchase commercially available information that’s consistent with the Constitution and the laws under the Electronic Communications Privacy Act, and it has led to some valuable intelligence for us.”

Representative Warren Davidson (R-Ohio) told NPR: “This is one of those issues that really doesn’t break on party lines. You’re collecting data that really you would never get a warrant for, that kind of a broad dragnet sweep under normal warrant requirements.” He teamed up with conservative Senator Mike Lee and Democrats Zoe Lofgren and Wyden on bicameral bipartisan FISA reform legislation.

Jake Laperruque, deputy director of the Security and Surveillance Project at the Center for Democracy and Technology, stated that purchasing bulk data from data brokers is “very much not what Congress intended when it said we are banning bulk collection. It wasn’t, you know, ‘do bulk collection, but also pay taxpayer money for it.’ It was ‘don’t do bulk collection.’” He added that the idea that law enforcement can purchase information from data brokers they would normally need a warrant for doesn’t make sense, particularly since it is often possible to identify individuals from supposedly anonymized data.

Anthropic CEO Dario Amodei warned in a statement in February 2026 that records the government can purchase can be used by AI to assemble “a comprehensive picture of any person’s life — automatically and at massive scale.” Amodei’s unwillingness to allow Anthropic’s technology to be used for domestic mass surveillance or autonomous weapons led to a major fight with the Pentagon, which says a private company cannot dictate how the government lawfully uses its technology.

Jeramie D. Scott, senior counsel and director of the Surveillance and Oversight Program at the Electronic Privacy Information Center, told NPR that government data purchases without a warrant are “contributing to an ever-expanding infrastructure of private sector surveillance that is hurtling us into a dystopian surveillance society.”

Privacy advocates say the upcoming FISA reauthorization debate is the best chance to close the so-called data broker loophole. “This is very likely the only chance that Congress has this year to vote for meaningful privacy protections,” said Sean Vitka, executive director of Demand Progress. As of April 2026, Congress has not acted.

Some of the key architects of artificial intelligence have warned how the advent of AI dramatically heightens the risk of warrantless mass surveillance. Congress must act now to end warrantless location tracking and prevent the government from paying to bypass Fourth Amendment protections.

The loophole persists because the institutional architecture that Powell built is designed to ensure that it persists. The lobbying infrastructure delays legislation. The captured judiciary interprets existing law narrowly. The weakened regulatory agencies lack enforcement capacity. And the technology integrates more deeply into the infrastructure of daily life with each passing year, raising the cost of regulation and lowering the political will to attempt it. The industry understands this intuitively. The political spending is front-loaded: not to win the argument permanently but to delay meaningful oversight until the integration is irreversible. You do not need to defeat regulation if you can ensure that by the time it arrives, the thing it would regulate has become load-bearing. Regulating it then means disrupting systems that millions of people depend on — which makes the regulation politically impossible even if it is substantively necessary.

-----

## III. The Convergence Abroad: Three Models, One Trajectory

The American trajectory — Powell’s institutional capture producing the regulatory vacuum that produced the data broker loophole that produced warrantless mass surveillance — is not unique. The global trajectory reveals something more disturbing: a convergence across political systems that defies the stated justifications of each but produces the same material outcome. The models differ in their stated justifications — market freedom (US), competitiveness (EU), social harmony (China), financial inclusion (India) — but the material outcomes are trending in the same direction: states and corporations accumulating unprecedented surveillance capacity over populations with diminishing oversight.

### The European Retreat

The EU built the most comprehensive privacy framework in the world. The GDPR requires compliance by any entity that processes personal data in the context of activities of an “establishment” in the EU, or processes personal data of individuals in the EU related to the offering of goods or services to them or monitoring their behavior. There is no revenue threshold, processing threshold, or broker threshold. The consequences of noncompliance are administrative fines up to €20 million or 4% of total worldwide annual turnover of the preceding financial year, whichever is higher.

In the EU, data brokers fall within the scope of the GDPR, which applies to all entities that process personal data and does not differentiate data brokers from other data controllers or processors in terms of obligations. Under the GDPR, any processing of personal data must have a lawful basis such as consent, legitimate interests, or contractual necessity. European residents have the “right to be forgotten.” The regulation centers on “personal data,” which involves all information relating to identifiable individuals.

But the GDPR has structural gaps even in its existing form. The GDPR framework can leave both legal and conceptual gaps when it comes to weighing the role that other, less directly consumer-connected parties gather, process, generate, and transmit data, such as the potential lack of GDPR coverage when one broker sells data it did not collect itself to another data broker. The inferences that data brokers create and sell, such as by using location data to derive information about military service or children in the home, can also receive inadequate coverage under data protection law. European regulators enforcing these laws have remained steadily focused on American Big Tech companies like Meta and Alphabet. An overarching regulatory emphasis on certain large U.S. players may skew attention away from companies like data brokers — based both in the United States and in European countries. Many European regulators discussing regulation of “data” or “technology” in general often explicitly reference or implicitly mean the same group of Big Tech companies; companies like Google, Facebook, Instagram, TikTok, and now OpenAI occupy a prominent role in the European regulator imagination.

The data broker industry is very successful and active in the USA; the largest companies come from this region. Europe has also seen an increasing focus on address trading. Data brokers operate globally in a digital data ecosystem under different jurisdictions. The GDPR and other relevant European legislative acts, like the Digital Services Act, operate according to the principle of lex loci solutionis, thus applying to the activities of data brokers based outside the EU when they target European citizens. Even well-known data brokers from the USA, such as Acxiom, are subject to European regulation when operating in Europe. But the GDPR does not directly address the subject of data brokers or data trading. Data protection law is not aimed at restricting trade on the data economy; instead it provides for the protection of personal data as a consequence of the right to data protection. The commodification of personal information is the root of the informal and economic power imbalances in the digital world. Even though the GDPR’s regulatory framework is justly subject to much criticism, it theoretically offers a handhold against the business model of commercial data trading. As in many other areas, however, data protection law is subject to an enforcement deficit.

An RTÉ investigation in Ireland — the country’s national media broadcaster — described how reporters gained access to brokered data on tens of thousands of smartphones in Ireland that was on the market and available to purchase. The report found that individual devices could be traced as they traveled between residential addresses, high-security prisons, health clinics, mental health facilities, military bases, and even Leinster House, where the Irish parliament is located. Ireland’s Data Protection Commission said it is “extremely concerned.” This data brokerage in Europe is putting U.S. service members and personnel at risk. The U.S. is waiting on Europe to step in.

The United States is the only country to have legally ratified four data broker registries — in California, Oregon, Vermont, and Texas — with another four in development in New Jersey, Delaware, Michigan, and Alaska. The US has led the way in establishing data broker registries due to its fragmented approach to data privacy regulation, where states often take the initiative in passing consumer protection laws. Unlike the European Union, which enforces broad privacy protections under the GDPR, the US relies on state-level and sector-specific laws, creating a patchwork of regulations. With no such data broker registry for the European Union, EU data privacy enforcement could struggle to regulate the market when there is no central record for data brokers operating in its jurisdiction.

And now the GDPR itself is being actively weakened.

In November 2025, the European Commission published two Digital Omnibus proposals — Digital Omnibus and Digital Omnibus on AI — and opened a Digital Fitness Check, part of a sweeping deregulation agenda for EU digital policies. European Digital Rights described this as “a massive reopening of EU’s core digital protections — so far including the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), ePrivacy Directive and the Artificial Intelligence (AI) Act — a move that risks dismantling the very foundation of human rights and tech policy in the EU.”

The European Commission published the Digital Omnibus Regulation Proposal, which amends the GDPR in substance. The amendments would amend the purpose-limitation/further-processing rule in Article 5(1)(b); insert new articles on breach notification, refine aspects of Article 22 on automated decision-making, place storage of and access to information on end-user terminal equipment on an explicit GDPR framework via a new Article 88a, enable standardization around machine-readable preference/consent signalling via Article 88b, insert a new Article 88c on processing for development, testing, training, deployment and operation of machine-learning models, and insert a new Article 41a on implementing acts for pseudonymisation/identifiability criteria.

The European Data Protection Board and the European Data Protection Supervisor adopted a joint opinion. They “strongly urge the co-legislators not to adopt the proposed changes to the definition of personal data as they go far beyond a targeted or technical amendment of the GDPR. In addition, they do not accurately reflect and clearly go beyond the CJEU jurisprudence, and they would result in significantly narrowing the concept of personal data.” They specifically warned that “the European Commission should not be entrusted to decide by an implementing act what is no longer personal data after pseudonymisation as it directly affects the scope of application of EU data protection law.” The EDPB statement concluded: “Simplification is essential to cut red tape and strengthen EU competitiveness — but not at the expense of fundamental rights.”

According to a leaked draft of the EU member states’ decision on the Digital Omnibus, circulated by the Cypriot presidency of the Council and dated February 20, 2026, the Council of the European Union eliminates the proposed new definition of “personal data” under the GDPR. European Digital Rights Policy Advisor Itxaso Domínguez de Olazábal posted that the Commission’s proposed change “would have made it easier for actors in complex processing chains to argue that data is ‘not personal’ from their perspective.”

According to an analysis by Austrian privacy NGO noyb, the leaked draft of the Omnibus could significantly weaken GDPR protections. It narrows the definition of personal data, meaning information that cannot directly identify an individual might no longer count as personal, even if it could be linked with other data. This would strip many pseudonymous identifiers, such as ad IDs and cookies, of GDPR protection, paving the way for more tracking and profiling. The draft also limits when people can exercise their rights to access, correct, or delete data, restricting them to “data protection purposes.” In practice, this could block workers, journalists, or consumers from using data requests in disputes.

The Omnibus introduces a “legitimate interest” exception allowing companies to use personal data, including some sensitive information, for AI training, provided unspecified safeguards are in place. Under these rules, high-risk AI systems could process massive amounts of European data legally, while traditional data storage and processing, like databases or CCTV footage, remain tightly regulated. Noyb warns this could give US and global tech companies freer rein to use European data for AI training or analytics. In practice, EU users would rarely know their data is being used, and objections would be nearly impossible to enforce.

The long-delayed ePrivacy regulation, which controls how companies access data on users’ phones, computers, and other devices, could be merged into the GDPR under the Digital Omnibus. Currently, websites must get explicit consent before storing or accessing most cookies. Under the proposed changes, companies could collect some data without asking first, either for a limited list of “low-risk” uses or under a broader legal basis called “legitimate interest,” which lets companies argue they can use data if it serves their business. This would shift Europe from an opt-in system to something closer to opt-out, where users must actively refuse to stop tracking.

Article 22 of the GDPR provides strict limits ensuring that people are not subject to significant decisions made solely by automated systems without meaningful human involvement. The Omnibus reframes Article 22 as a broader permission for automation, giving firms more room to deploy automated systems in sensitive contexts where human review matters, weakening safeguards against unfair decisions. It also reduces the threshold for what counts as meaningful human involvement and turns a prohibition with exceptions into an authorisation subject to conditions. This shift makes it easier to rely on automation by default and harder for people to challenge decisions that significantly affect their lives.

The Digital Omnibus on AI tears the AI Act apart, undermining its key protections, including oversight and transparency mechanisms. Those making or selling AI systems could exempt themselves from fundamental rules, turning the EU’s flagship legislation into a “carte blanche” for high-risk algorithmic technologies. It delays the high-risk requirements without a clear timeline — caving to industry’s demands — and ultimately subverting the protections for people from AI harms and completely undermining legal certainty. The proposal weakens transparency, accountability and the role of fundamental rights bodies. This will leave people without effective redress when AI systems harm or discriminate against them.

EDRi stated: “Despite the Commission’s attempts to play down the issue, the Digital Omnibus is a full-on betrayal of Europe’s promise.”

The EFF stated that the GDPR “is the most comprehensive model for privacy legislation around the world. While it is far from perfect and suffers from uneven enforcement, complexities and certain administrative burdens, the omnibus package is full of bad and confusing ideas that, on balance, will significantly weaken privacy protections for users in the name of cutting red tape.” The EFF noted one positive element: requiring online interfaces to respect automated consent signals, allowing users to automatically reject consent across all websites instead of clicking through cookie popups. But “much as we love limiting cookie fatigue, it’s not worth the price users will pay if the rest of the proposal is adopted.”

Amnesty International described the Digital Omnibus as a situation where “corporations work hard to give regulation a bad name, but regulations protect our rights from being steamrolled by states and governments. They protect our environment, our rights at work, our rights online, and so much more. Backed by powerful corporations, the Commission’s so-called ‘Digital Omnibus’ threatens to weaken EU digital rules that were once seen as global benchmarks for privacy and AI. This plays on a false dichotomy between regulation and innovation, championed by Big Tech, who seek a rules-free environment that prioritizes profit at any cost.” Amnesty further noted: “Pressure is mounting across different areas of regulation, resulting in the rolling back of environmental protections, the weakening corporate governance and erosion of digital rights. It all amounts to a coordinated effort to weaken corporate accountability. Rolling back these protections puts all of us at risk.”

Technologist Robin Berjon warned that the proposed reforms “go beyond mere simplification. We’ve seen the European Commission be weak on enforcement and hesitant to anger the American authorities, but the omnibus changes go much further. American tech monopolies and intelligence agencies are the biggest beneficiaries of the surveillance economy and these changes strengthen their hand to instead actively sabotage European businesses and national security.”

The Commission’s Executive Vice President Henna Virkkunen met with top US tech executives to pitch a more business-friendly Europe and highlight plans to simplify digital rules. The reforms follow a report by former Italian Prime Minister Mario Draghi warning that Europe’s complex laws are stifling innovation and holding the region back in global competition with the US and China.

The outcome matters far beyond Europe. For a decade, the GDPR set a global standard for privacy that influenced laws in countries from Brazil to India and California. If Brussels now reverses course, the ripple effects could reshape how data protection and AI regulation are approached worldwide.

Itxaso Domínguez de Olazábal, writing in TechPolicy.Press, argued: “Changing core rules on privacy and data protection requires clear evidence and rigorous analysis. The Commission has provided neither. It did not publish a fundamental rights impact assessment, nor present data showing that current rules harm responsible firms. Similarly, it did not explain why enforcement challenges justify weakening rights. Even with proper procedure, some changes remain unacceptable. Laws tied to Article 7, the protection for private and family life, and Article 8, the protection of personal data, of the Charter of Fundamental Rights of the European Union safeguard people against both state and corporate intrusion and should not be lowered under any circumstances.”

If the GDPR falls — if the Digital Omnibus hollows out the framework — there is no major democratic government on earth with a comprehensive framework strong enough to matter. Brazil’s LGPD, India’s DPDP Act, and the other frameworks modeled on the GDPR lose their conceptual anchor. The global standard becomes a global floor that everyone races beneath.

### China and India

Ralph Schroeder’s research at Oxford identifies the Social Credit System in China and the Aadhaar system in India as “two cases of the most rapid capture of personal data about national populations in history.” So far, there is limited research about how the two systems operate in practice, on the ground. Yet for the longer-term shaping of the two systems — including notions of privacy, the role of the state in promoting digital technologies, and the relation among states, markets, and civil societies — there is extensive research to draw on.

China’s Social Credit System aims to establish a “sincerity culture” by rating trustworthiness and providing benefits to the trustworthy and punishing the untrustworthy. There is already a debate as to whether this marks the arrival of “digital dictatorship” in China ending its “fragmented authoritarianism” and to that extent is unique to that setting, or it marks the arrival of a “global age of algorithm” raising global concerns. China’s model is perhaps not an isolated case.

In 2024, the NDRC issued the 2024-2025 action plan, which foregrounds building more complete credit legislation (including pushing for a Social Credit Construction Law), improving unified codes, strengthening platform infrastructure and data security, and creating a more unified credit repair mechanism. In 2025, the NDRC and the PBOC issued the 2025 editions of the national basic catalogue of public credit information and the national basic list of disciplinary measures. These documents institutionalize a key governance theme: define the boundaries of public credit data and discipline, and reduce arbitrary expansion. In March 2025, a Party-and-State Council guideline explicitly targeted improvement of the social credit system with 23 measures and, in the official English summary, stressed safeguards around information security, individual rights, and guarding against excessive collection and illegal use of information.

New innovations in technology are playing a large role. AI facial recognition software is utilized in tandem with over 200 million surveillance cameras in China. The purpose of large-scale surveillance measures is to give Chinese officials the ability to track their citizens in every facet of everyday life, providing masses of data to determine whether an act worthy of being blacklisted has occurred. The government continues to track the online behaviors of its citizens.

It is sometimes imagined that the system automatically creates entries for individuals based on surveillance footage or other digital streams. This is not currently the case. All entries into an individual’s China social credit rating are manually entered and overseen by officials. Currently, there is no one “social credit score” that applies across all of China. There are many different social credit scores depending on the region or city. The system remains a work-in-progress that is fragmented between local and central governments regarding interpretation of policies and implementation. Many aspects of China’s social credit system have similarities with US scoring and penalty systems including FICO credit scores, tech rating systems (Uber, Airbnb), and historical precedents like the Hollywood blacklist of the 1940s and 1950s.

India’s Aadhaar — the world’s largest biometric identification system — issues a 12-digit number to every resident, generated after recording their demographic as well as biometric data such as fingerprints and iris scans. The program began in 2009 as a voluntary system. Its original purpose was to ensure access to welfare programs, to include the undocumented into the system so as to be able to correctly disseminate social benefits to the right individuals. In 2012, it became mandatory for all citizens; otherwise they would be denied entitlements and government services.

Despite claiming that participation was voluntary, the Indian government made Aadhaar mandatory for citizens to access a variety of social and financial services such as maintaining bank accounts and insurance policies, even for paying taxes. Still, even by 2017, there were hardly any legislative measures in place to protect the data being collected by the government and the technology companies that worked on its behalf. The project has raised fears of privacy violations and mass surveillance. Soon after it was launched, Indian intelligence officials said its purpose was to flush out illegal immigrants in the country — the reason why residents and not just citizens were asked to register for Aadhaar — and the claim that Aadhaar would help deliver welfare schemes was just a ruse. Security officials made attempts to use the Aadhaar database to find “criminals.”

India and China have launched enormous projects aimed at collecting vital personal information regarding their billion-plus populations and building the world’s biggest data sets in the process. Both Aadhaar and the Social Credit System are controversial and raise a plethora of political and ethical concerns. The governments claim that participation in these projects is voluntary, even as they link vital services to citizens registering with these projects. Topic modeling of news coverage suggests coverage in both nations disregards the public interest and focuses largely on how businesses can benefit from them. The media, institutionally and ideologically linked with governments and corporations, show little concern with violations of privacy and mass surveillance that these projects could lead to. Researchers argue that this renders citizens structurally incapable of making informed choices about participation.

The comparison between China and India points to the potential dangers of “big data” in ushering a surveillance state apparatus and the existence of blurred boundaries between democracy and authoritarianism when it comes to social control.

India’s Aadhaar biometric identification system, though different in purpose from China’s Social Credit System, raised comparable concerns about data privacy and state control. Russia’s increasing adoption of facial recognition surveillance technology to monitor citizens and political activists mirrors aspects of China’s practices. These developments underline the global trend toward increased digital surveillance, prompting crucial ethical and political discussions worldwide.

The distinction between a democratic government purchasing your location data from a broker and an authoritarian government collecting it directly is a distinction of method, not of outcome. The citizen is rendered transparent. The state is rendered opaque. The asymmetry is the same.

-----

## IV. The Diagnostician: Bruce Schneier, Book by Book, Warning by Warning

Bruce Schneier is a public-interest technologist working at the intersection of security, technology, and people. He has been writing about security issues on his blog since 2004 and in his monthly newsletter since 1998. He is a fellow and lecturer at Harvard’s Kennedy School, a board member of EFF, and the Chief of Security Architecture at Inrupt, Inc. He is an internationally renowned security technologist and the New York Times bestselling author of 14 books. He has spent twenty years producing the most precise diagnosis of the surveillance state available in the English language. He has watched every one of his warnings validated. None of his proposed solutions have been implemented at federal scale.

### Data and Goliath (2015): The Diagnosis

*Data and Goliath: The Hidden Battles to Collect Your Data and Control Your World* is a book about surveillance, both government and corporate. It is an exploration in three parts: what’s happening, why it matters, and what to do about it. Schneier wrote: “We’ve been on a headlong path of more and more surveillance, fueled by fear — of terrorism mostly — on the government side, and convenience on the corporate side. My goal was to step back and say ‘wait a minute; does any of this make sense?’”

The book’s structure consists of 16 chapters divided over three parts: (1) “The world we’re creating”; (2) “What’s at stake”; and (3) “What to do about it.” Every single section has a lesson, usually concisely expressed in the last sentence — a “take-away sentence” that makes it both inspiring and easier to grasp for laymen as well as professionals.

Schneier’s framework rests on interlocking structural arguments:

**All personal data collection is surveillance.** Schneier refers to all types of personal data collection as “surveillance,” whether the information is gathered for law enforcement or intelligence purposes, acquired for commercial use, or recorded for no particular reason at all. Under this sweeping definition, the National Security Agency and the FBI perform surveillance, but so do Google, Sears, and the local liquor store. Part 1 describes the role of data in a surveillance society. It starts by defining data as a by-product of computing, emphasizing that access to the data surrounding a person means access to that person. Subsequently, it explains how data can be used as surveillance, emphasizing that content data collection is invasive, and metadata equally so.

**De-anonymization destroys the fiction of aggregate data.** Chapter 3 moves to the analysis of data and explains the correlations made possible by Big Data analytics, and how even large sets of anonymous data can presently be de-anonymized. It concludes by stating that more robust techniques for preserving anonymity are needed.

**The business of surveillance.** The business of surveillance is discussed in Chapter 4, which focuses on corporate surveillance and the exchange of our data for services. It explains Internet tracking via cookies, behavioral advertising as well as the data broking industry. While doing so, it studies power concentrations in this industry and loss of control of users over their computer environment.

**Government surveillance.** Chapter 5 turns to government surveillance, with a focus on the US agencies and the Snowden revelations, while also looking at other governments’ practices, including the UK and Germany.

**Corporate and government surveillance are symbiotic, not separate.** A very important point made in Chapter 6 is that corporate surveillance and government surveillance are intertwined, supporting one another. The data flows bidirectionally. Google and other firms that collect massive amounts of private data from their customers have set up a situation in which the privacy rights of millions, even billions, depend solely on the good intentions of a few powerful decision-makers in private companies.

**The real binary is liberty versus control.** Schneier reframes the fundamental debate: “The real choice is liberty versus control. Tyranny, whether it arises under threat of foreign physical attack or under constant domestic authoritative scrutiny, is still tyranny. Liberty requires security without intrusion, security plus privacy. Widespread police surveillance is the very definition of a police state. And that’s why we should champion privacy even when we have nothing to hide.”

**Privacy is not about hiding wrongdoing.** The most common retort against privacy advocates — by those in favor of ID checks, cameras, databases, data mining and other wholesale surveillance measures — is: “If you aren’t doing anything wrong, what do you have to hide?” Schneier’s response: “My problem with quips like these — as right as they are — is that they accept the premise that privacy is about hiding a wrong. It’s not. Privacy is an inherent human right, and a requirement for maintaining the human condition with dignity and respect.”

**The chilling effect is the mechanism of control.** Schneier identifies threats to political liberty and justice: governments could potentially squash political dissent and social change, put in place government censorship, or accuse users of crimes in the future based on redefining previously acceptable behavior — for example, creating a post on Facebook that criticizes a political candidate or their rhetoric. Before a change in law or authoritarian leadership, this could be an acceptable form of free speech, but afterwards it earns you the label of enemy of the state. Individual identification and anonymity are threatened due to the capacity to aggregate data about your every move online and profile you. Trying to create a new identity and separate yourself from this online profile is very difficult. Couple this with constant surveillance, and people’s freedom to do as they please is vastly diminished.

**Mass surveillance doesn’t work for its stated purpose.** “More than just being ineffective, the NSA’s surveillance efforts have actually made us less secure.” The Privacy and Civil Liberties Oversight Board found the “Section 215” program for bulk collection of telephone metadata to be nearly useless, as well as likely illegal and problematic in other ways. Aside from the inherent violations of privacy, Schneier condemns the NSA practice of stockpiling — instead of repairing — computer software vulnerabilities and government strong-arming of Internet firms to compel them to surrender customer data.

**Data is power — the structural core.** “Data is power. Any entity, whether public or private, that holds data about individuals has some ability to understand, predict, and manipulate their behavior.”

**Surveillance is a tactic of intimidation.** “Surveillance is a tactic of intimidation,” Schneier writes, and “in the US, we already see the beginnings of a chilling effect.” Surveillance shapes awareness and alters conduct. Many people will slow down when driving past a police car or a traffic surveillance camera. Almost all will modify their speech or their behavior depending on who is listening or watching.

**Solutions.** In the latter portions of the book, Schneier presents an action agenda for curbing inappropriate surveillance including steps that can be taken by government, by corporations, and by concerned members of the public. The proposals are principled and thoughtful, though he admits not all are readily achievable. The EU data protection framework is mentioned as a leading example of data protection regulation. Companies are called upon to fight government surveillance and support litigation efforts against warrants. Solutions for “the rest of us” are offered, both in the context of private lives (such as privacy-enhancing technologies or choosing the provider we trust most) as well as asking for political change (engaging with legislators, supporting relevant non-governmental organizations), and, most importantly, not giving up, because “fatalism is the enemy of change.”

Schneier acknowledged the paradox: “We need government regulations that protect our privacy by limiting what these sites can do with our data.” But as one commenter on his blog noted: “Calling for more government regulation when the government is a big part of the problem with ubiquitous surveillance seems counterproductive.” Another commenter put it more bluntly: “Does anyone seriously think that if a site that truly offered privacy gained any traction, that they wouldn’t be co-opted or shut down? The government has become far too addicted to the data to give it up. Changes to the law are unlikely to help, because, as with the ancient Chinese empire, changes at the top fail to change the system, which is enforced by an endless army of faceless bureaucrats.”

Schneier’s core objective was to preserve, or to restore, a domain of personal privacy that is impervious to unwanted intrusion or monitoring. He acknowledges the necessity of surveillance for valid law enforcement and intelligence purposes. “If we can provide law enforcement people with new ways to investigate crime, they’ll stop demanding that security be subverted for their benefit.”

Malcolm Gladwell stated: “The public conversation about surveillance in the digital age would be a good deal more intelligent if we all read Bruce Schneier first.”

The book was published in 2015. Every warning in it has been validated. The surveillance apparatus has expanded in every dimension Schneier identified. No comprehensive federal privacy law has been enacted. The corporate-government surveillance symbiosis has deepened. The data broker loophole remains open. The situation is categorically worse in every dimension he identified. *Data and Goliath* was an Occupy moment for cybersecurity — massive initial intellectual capital, perfect diagnosis, zero institutional capture. The book produced awareness without infrastructure.

### Rewiring Democracy (2025): The Attempted Transition from Diagnosis to Institutional Tooling

Schneier’s latest book, *Rewiring Democracy: How AI Will Transform Our Politics, Government, and Citizenship*, co-authored with Nathan Sanders and published by MIT Press on October 21, 2025, attempts to move from diagnosis to counter-strategy — what we might call the Claude Code equivalent of his intellectual project: an attempt to build durable integration into the systems where decisions are actually made.

The book examines how AI technologies will affect democracy in five broad areas: politics, legislating, administration, the judiciary, and citizenship. There is a lot to unpack, both positive and negative. Schneier noted: “We do talk about AI’s possible role in both democratic backsliding or restoring democracies, but the fundamental focus of the book is on present and future uses of AIs within functioning democracies. And, yes, we talk about AI-driven propaganda and artificial conversation. Some of what we write about is happening now, but much of what we write about is speculation.”

The book’s core thesis, described by *Nature* as resting on a “thorny premise,” is that democracy is an information system. AI is transforming that information system. Whether these outcomes enhance or degrade democracy depends on how we shape the development and use of AI technologies.

Schneier and Sanders describe how the sophistication of AI will fulfill demands from lawmakers for more complex legislation, reducing deference to the executive branch and altering the balance of power between lawmakers and administrators. They show how the scale and scope of AI is enhancing civil servants’ ability to shape private-sector behavior, automating either the enforcement or neglect of industry regulations. They explain how both lawyers and judges will leverage the speed of AI, upending how we think about law enforcement, litigation, and dispute resolution.

The optimistic case: AI can give legislators with limited resources help in drafting bills with fewer strings attached than a lobbyist or an advocacy organization’s model legislation. The first law anywhere known to have been written by AI arose from Porto Alegre, Brazil, when a city councillor simply needed some help writing a bill about water utility infrastructure and turned to ChatGPT. In the future, legislators might choose not just to use an AI model to draft the text of a bill but might actually choose to designate an AI model as the form of their legislation. Traditional textual legislation suffers from ambiguity and inflexibility when interpreted decades later. An AI model could clarify its intent with unlimited precision and express an interpretation of a rule in response to any future special case or scenario.

Powerful players in private industry and public life are already using AI to increase their influence, and AIs built by corporations to drive shareholder value aren’t designed to deliver the fairness and trust necessary to enhance democratic governance. But, steered in the right direction, the broad scope of an AI-augmented democracy would help citizens build consensus, express their voice, and organize against anti-democratic policies.

Schneier and Sanders lay out a four-part plan of action:

1. Resist inappropriate uses of AI.
1. Seek responsible uses of AI in governance.
1. Reform the ecosystem of AI.
1. Renovate our democracy to prepare it for AI.

Schneier himself acknowledges: “The last one feels most urgent right now.”

He states the power concentration problem directly: “We already know the answer, because we’ve seen it happen: in big tech in general and with social media in particular. The powerful get more powerful, and then use that power to enact legislative changes that further protect that power. The concentration of wealth and power is bigger than AI, of course. It’s bigger than technology. But it’s exacerbated by technologies like AI. Our task as a democracy is to ensure that technologies broadly distribute power amongst the many rather than concentrate it among the few. We return to this problem again and again in our book.”

He describes AI as “fundamentally a power magnifying technology. It takes the command of one person and executes on it with greater speed, scale, scope, and sophistication than any one human could.” That is exactly right. And the people who currently have AI — the consolidated state-corporate apparatus — are using it to magnify their power. The book’s proposed counter-uses require citizens to first obtain equivalent AI capabilities and institutional access — a bootstrapping problem with no clean entry point.

**The structural weakness.** The book was published on October 21, 2025. By that date, DOGE had already been operating for months, doing exactly what the book warned about in the abstract.

One Goodreads reviewer wrote: “Felt out of date as it predates 2025 governmental changes.” Another reviewer noted: “The real question that should have been asked throughout the book is whether our ‘democracy’ has benefited people and how artificial intelligence, either generative or agentic AI, can help fight bad actors or assist good actors in the system. Can AI be used by non-partisan groups to help educate voters? Should AI be used in the vote counting process? Should the population worry about governments using surveillance technology infused with AI?” That reviewer gave it a 6/10, identifying the core weakness: the book treats democracy as a functioning system that needs optimization, rather than a captured system that needs liberation.

Even Vint Cerf’s blurb contains the tell: “While Schneier and Sanders are more optimistic than I am about the future of artificial intelligence and policy, you will be glad to have taken the time to read and understand their well-articulated arguments.” When the man who helped build the internet is hedging against your optimism, that is a signal.

The book’s framework rests on a premise that maps directly onto the first-mover trap: it assumes the existence of institutional channels through which its recommendations can flow.

“Resist inappropriate uses of AI” — requires regulatory bodies with enforcement power. Those are being gutted.

“Seek responsible uses of AI in governance” — requires a government interested in responsible governance. DOGE is exfiltrating databases and handing them to Palantir.

“Reform the ecosystem of AI” — requires legislative action. The same Congress that didn’t mention Schneier’s testimony in their hearing summary.

“Renovate our democracy to prepare it for AI” — requires a functional democracy to renovate. Which circles back to the entire problem.

The book is proposing feature improvements to a platform that has been acquired by a hostile actor. It is writing a better user manual for a product whose new owner has already changed the terms of service.

### Congressional Testimony (June 2025): The Warning That Was Not Recorded

On June 5, 2025, Schneier testified before the House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform at a hearing titled “The Federal Government in the Age of Artificial Intelligence.” He later wrote: “The other speakers mostly talked about how cool AI was — and sometimes about how cool their own company was — but I was asked by the Democrats to specifically talk about DOGE and the risks of exfiltrating our data from government agencies and feeding it into AIs.”

He outlined what he called a “DOGE approach” to data handling, with four distinct features:

**Data consolidation:** Exfiltrating and connecting massive U.S. databases to create a single pool of data covering all citizens.

**Reduced security protocols:** Removing access controls and audit logs, creating unmonitored copies of data, exposing highly sensitive data to cloud-based tools, seeking maximally permissive data access waivers, and eliminating previously required security protocols for vetting staff.

**AI training and processing:** Using AI tools to process data outside of carefully monitored environments.

**Offering data to private companies:** DOGE’s affiliates have spread across government. They are still exfiltrating massive US databases, processing them with AI and offering them to private companies such as Palantir.

He told Congress: “Data security breaches present significant dangers to everyone in the United States, from private citizens to corporations to government agencies to elected officials. Over the past four months, DOGE’s approach to data access has massively exacerbated the risk. DOGE employees have accessed and exfiltrated data from a variety of government agencies in order to, in part, train AI systems. Their actions have weakened security within the federal government by bypassing and disabling critical security measures, exporting sensitive data to environments with less security, and consolidating disparate data streams to create a massively attractive target for any adversary.”

He stated: “Data consolidation might seem harmless or even positive, but we have to understand what’s at stake when our data gets consolidated. Data is power. Any entity, whether public or private, that holds data about individuals has some ability to understand, predict, and manipulate their behavior.”

He warned: “Whether you fear government tyranny, attacks from foreign adversaries, or attacks from domestic malicious actors, the AI-fueled consolidation of citizen data should make your fears grow. If the consolidation is carried out recklessly and in secret, as DOGE affiliates are largely doing, this new and unchecked power presents serious risks to every American.”

He told Congress directly: “You all need to assume that adversaries have copies of all the data DOGE has exfiltrated and has established access into all the networks that DOGE has removed security controls from.”

He warned that any military action against the United States could be preceded by the zeroing-out of bank accounts for military and political leaders — made possible by the consolidation of Treasury and OPM data.

He warned that access to Americans’ data could give private companies “significant advantages in training AI systems and in setting business strategy. Without proper oversight, this access could lead to private companies profiting from sensitive information or foreign governments exploiting vulnerabilities. The safeguards protecting government data were built over years to protect Americans, but these protections are already eroding. The consequences could be immediate or unfold over time, leading to loss of services, harassment, discrimination, or manipulation by the government.”

In an earlier interview with the Harvard Kennedy School, Schneier was asked whether DOGE’s data handling could be secure. His response: “We know they’re not. Just the fact that it’s happening so quickly tells us so. Security is hard; it takes time, and nothing secure happens this quickly. I feel confident in saying there’s simply no way that they can be secure in what they’re doing. And that the insecurities are enormous. For example, I worry about the audit systems. We have comprehensive systems for recording what these systems do and what happens, and we use those audit records to go back and figure out what happened. If these audit systems have been compromised, and it’s likely they have, now an attacker can make undetectable changes in the system — and that is its own level of scariness.”

He added: “I think this actually could undermine the Trump administration’s agenda. Whatever this government actually wants to do, it almost certainly does not include giving foreign governments a full take of what agencies like the Treasury Department and OPM know and do.”

He noted: “In 2024, China hacked the Office of Personnel Management and took copies of some of that data. They wanted to be able to map who is involved in government, who has a clearance, and who might be a spy entering their own country.”

Representative Nancy Mace (R-SC), chairing the subcommittee, opened the hearing by focusing on AI’s potential as a productivity tool — “all the more necessary amid DOGE’s efforts to reduce the federal workforce.” She said: “The federal government has a responsibility to harness this technology to make government work faster and more efficiently for the American people.” Witnesses from think tanks and AI firms echoed the party line, talking up AI as a way to streamline inefficient bureaucracy and maintain economic competitiveness.

*The Register* reported that Schneier “played the skunk at the garden party.” Schneier’s message wasn’t what the lawmakers running the hearing wanted to hear — in fact, his testimony goes unmentioned amid the Oversight committee’s AI-boosting summary of the event.

He stated: “The previous four speakers have talked about the promises of this technology. I want to talk about the national security implications of the way our country is consolidating data and feeding it to AI models.”

-----

## V. The Safety Company and Its General Magic Arc

There is a company — dead since 2004, liquidated, its patents sold to Paul Allen — that illuminates Anthropic’s trajectory with the precision of a parable. It was called General Magic. The parallel is not cosmetic. It is structural, and the structural failures map onto Anthropic’s present with uncomfortable precision.

### General Magic: The Company That Invented the Future and Was Destroyed by It

General Magic was an American software and early smartphone electronics company co-founded by Bill Atkinson, Andy Hertzfeld, and Marc Porat. Based in Mountain View, California, the company developed precursors to USB, software modems, small touchscreens, touchscreen controller integrated circuits, ASICs, multimedia email, networked games, streaming TV, and early e-commerce notions. According to Electronics Weekly, the company “developed a precursor of USB, software modems, small touchscreens, touchscreen controller ICs, ASICs, multimedia email, networked games, streaming TV and early e-commerce notions.” According to former General Magic employee Marco DeMiroz, it was the “Fairchild of the 90s.”

The original project started in 1989 within Apple Computer, when Marc Porat convinced Apple’s then-CEO John Sculley that the next generation of computing would require a partnership of computer, communications, and consumer electronics companies to cooperate. Known as the Paradigm project, the project ran for some time within Apple, but management remained generally uninterested and the team struggled for resources. Eventually they approached Sculley with the idea of spinning off the group as a separate company, which occurred in May 1990. Apple took a minority stake, with Sculley joining the General Magic board.

Porat, Hertzfeld, and Atkinson were soon joined by Susan Kare, Joanna Hoffman (vice president of marketing), hardware pioneer Wendell Sander, Walt Broedner, and Megan Smith who joined from Apple Japan, and most of Apple’s System 7 team. The company initially operated in near-complete secrecy.

Marc Porat had conceptualized what was essentially an early version of the smartphone. The device, named Pocket Crystal, was a touchscreen mobile computer that could one day make calls, fax documents, play games, watch movies, and buy plane tickets. Marc Porat wrote in his notebook: “A small device that will be your phone, your wallet, and your window to the world.” In approximately 1994, Porat was filmed predicting “smart phones, smart pagers, and maybe even things like intelligent watches” — describing both the iPhone and Apple Watch decades ahead of time. Then a reporter asked him if it was possible that anyone would ever figure out a way to make any money from such products.

By 1992, some of the world’s largest electronics corporations, including Sony, Motorola, Matsushita, Philips, and AT&T Corporation were partners and investors in General Magic. Instead of manufacturing everything in-house, they assembled an unwieldy alliance of companies to make and maintain their product. Some of these companies were natural enemies — Sony and Panasonic, for instance, were deeply competitive in many markets. But they were supposed to work together. In reality, these companies and their inter-relationships brought enormous levels of complexity. As one team member described it: “We were putting sixteen of the largest companies on the planet, who are natural enemies, into the same room at the same time. We knew we were innovating. No one had done anything like that. And if it succeeded, it would change everything.”

The company went public in 1995 — with no shipped product or revenue — at a value of $834 million, raising over $90 million. It was a unicorn before there was such a thing.

The company’s main product was Magic Cap, an operating system which allowed users to “set their own rules for message alerts and acquiring information” on PDAs. The basic idea was to distribute the typical computing load across many machines in the network. The company also introduced the programming language Telescript, compiled into cross-platform bytecode in much the same fashion as Java, but able to migrate running processes between virtual machines. The developers saw a time when Telescript application engines would be ubiquitous, and interconnected Telescript engines would form a “Telescript Cloud” across which mobile applications could execute.

The company achieved many technical breakthroughs: software modems (eliminating the need for modem chips), small touchscreens and touchscreen controller ASICs, highly integrated systems-on-a-chip designs, rich multimedia email, networked games, streaming television, and early versions of e-commerce. It offered futuristic features like a touchscreen, downloadable apps, and animated emojis — the first of its kind.

Then came the collapse.

In 1992-1993, while Sculley was still a director of General Magic, Apple entered the consumer electronics market with a poorly received personal digital assistant that became the Apple Newton. Sculley launched the Newton at the 1993 Consumer Electronics Show, and General Magic’s staff were blindsided. For the past few years, General Magic had been developing their product in “stealth mode.” All work documents were shredded and thrown in separate bins. Employees were told not to discuss work matters outside the office. The company believed that if their concept leaked, they would lose their competitive edge. One exception was Apple’s Sculley, who had some access — General Magic had been spun out of Apple, after all; Sculley was on its board.

Andy Hertzfeld said, later: “They were our closest partner, who really gave us our life. And so when we found out they were trying to kill us, we felt completely betrayed.”

When General Magic finally shipped in 1994 — under the threat of Apple’s Newton — they hadn’t made the Pocket Crystal that Porat first dreamed of in 1989. Instead, they released the Sony Magic Link. It weighed 1.5 lbs and was priced at $800 (approximately $1,560 in 2022 dollars). It was slow because the processors of the time couldn’t keep up, and the battery disappeared in the blink of an eye.

Tony Fadell, who worked at General Magic, thought it would be revolutionary — people could now carry a personal computer with them wherever they went. But nobody bought it. In the end only three to four thousand Magic Link devices were sold, and mostly to family and friends. Fadell said that it crushed him.

The biggest mistake was ignoring the open Internet. General Magic was building its own closed network while the rest of the world was just beginning to dive into the World Wide Web. They were building the world’s most beautiful swimming pool while an ocean was flowing right next to them.

By 1997, the company’s original idea was dead. It officially shut down in 2002. Paul Allen purchased most of its patents in 2004.

The people involved at the time were devastated. But many General Magic employees went on to bigger and better things:

- Tony Fadell went to Apple, where he created the iPod and then the iPhone — using every painful lesson learned from General Magic.
- Andy Rubin created the Android system, which now powers billions of phones.
- Pierre Omidyar wrote the code for his little side project while sitting in the General Magic office — that project is today’s eBay.
- Megan Smith became a VP for Google, then the third CTO of the US under President Obama.
- Kevin Lynch helped invent the Apple Watch.

None of them got rich off their General Magic work, but they can all take pride in knowing they created something that was far ahead of its time. The engineers of General Magic didn’t lose. They simply drew the map that we all use today.

The lessons Silicon Valley learned thanks to failures like General Magic helped create our digital revolution. The story of General Magic is a reminder that in technology, timing is more important than the idea itself. You can be right, you can be a genius, but if you show up to the party three hours too early, you’ll be sitting in an empty room by yourself.

So much of Apple’s current DNA shows up in General Magic. The focus on the user, obsession with design, insistence on simplicity, and love of big ideas is already there. A new documentary about the small company that was decades ahead of its time, the film *General Magic*, opened at the Tribeca Film Festival on April 20, 2018, and raises questions about Silicon Valley’s philosophy on failure.

### The Parallel with Anthropic: Point by Point

The parallels between General Magic and Anthropic are structural, not cosmetic:

**Origin story.** General Magic was founded by the people who built the Macintosh — the most important team at the most important company in personal computing — who left because they believed the parent organization couldn’t see what was coming. Anthropic was founded in 2021 by former OpenAI researchers, including co-founders Dario and Daniela Amodei, who left because they believed OpenAI couldn’t maintain safety principles at scale. Both companies were born from disillusionment with the organization that should have led the revolution.

**The parent betrayal.** Apple’s John Sculley — who was on General Magic’s board and had access to its proprietary work — launched the Newton at CES 1993, blindsiding the team. Hertzfeld: “They were our closest partner, who really gave us our life. And so when we found out they were trying to kill us, we felt completely betrayed.” Anthropic’s parent — OpenAI, the organization its founders built — has become its primary competitor, systematically abandoning the safety principles that motivated Anthropic’s founding while publicly claiming safety leadership. Sam Altman hasn’t just launched a Newton. He has launched a $20+ billion consumer juggernaut with Microsoft’s distribution network behind it, while publicly claiming safety leadership. The parent didn’t just compete — it adopted the language of the child’s mission while gutting its substance.

From 2024 to 2025, OpenAI experienced a systematic exodus of senior executives. Co-founder and Chief Scientist Ilya Sutskever left to found Safe Superintelligence. CTO Mira Murati left to found Thinking Machines Lab. Co-founders John Schulman and Jan Leike, head of the Superalignment team, went to Anthropic. Chief Research Officer Bob McGrew left. Vice President of Research Barret Zoph left. Co-founder and president Greg Brockman went on extended leave. Of OpenAI’s original 11 co-founders, only Sam Altman and researcher Wojciech Zaremba remained full-time by the end of 2025. A former employee told Fortune: “OpenAI without Ilya is a different company; OpenAI without Greg is a very different company.”

Anthropic presents a different picture. All seven co-founders — Dario Amodei, Daniela Amodei, Jared Kaplan, Jack Clark, Sam McCandlish, Ben Mann, and Tom Brown — are still with the company, and there has not been a single public executive-level departure in its five-year history. The contrast is so striking that it’s worth asking what Anthropic did to keep people around. In early 2026, Forbes estimated that each of the seven co-founders held approximately 1.8% of the shares, with minimal variation. At a $380 billion valuation, each person’s stake was worth about $6.8 billion. This nearly equal equity structure differs sharply from Silicon Valley norms, where the CEO typically holds the largest share.

**The alliance problem.** General Magic assembled an unwieldy alliance — AT&T, Apple, Motorola, Sony, Panasonic, Phillips — some natural enemies, all supposed to work together, all bringing enormous complexity. Anthropic operates its models on a broad hardware base, including AWS Trainium, Google TPUs, and NVIDIA GPUs. Amazon remains the primary cloud provider and training partner. Claude is the only frontier AI model available on all three major cloud platforms: Amazon Web Services (Bedrock), Google Cloud (Vertex AI), and Microsoft Azure (Foundry). But Amazon has its own Titan models. Google has Gemini. Microsoft backs OpenAI. The alliance partners are simultaneously investors, cloud providers, and competitors with their own AI ambitions.

**The infrastructure mismatch.** General Magic built a luxury Ferrari, but the world didn’t have asphalt yet. The infrastructure — broadband, processors, batteries — didn’t exist to support the vision. The Sony Magic Link cost $800, was slow, and the battery died. Anthropic faces the inverse mismatch: the infrastructure for surveillance exists and is operational. The institutional capture that prevents the regulatory infrastructure for safety is already in place. The question is not whether the world is ready for responsible AI. It is whether responsible AI can survive in a world that has been architecturally designed to prevent it.

Anthropic’s inference costs were 23% higher than anticipated. Gross margins improved from -94% in 2024 to approximately 40% in 2025 — still 10 percentage points below earlier optimistic expectations. The lower-than-expected gross profit margin resulted from the costs of running Anthropic models for paying customers on servers from Google and Amazon. If Anthropic also counted inference costs for Claude chatbot users that don’t pay for a subscription, its gross margin would be about 38%. In contrast, OpenAI projected a gross margin of around 46% in 2025. Both companies spend a tremendous amount on renting servers to develop new models — training costs, which don’t factor into gross margins — making it more difficult to turn a net profit than it is for traditional software and cloud firms. Anthropic expected its training costs for 2025 to be roughly $4.1 billion. OpenAI expected to spend $9.4 billion on compute for training.

**The timing problem.** General Magic arrived too early — the market didn’t exist yet. Anthropic’s safety mission faces the inverse timing problem. The market exists — $30 billion in revenue proves it. But the market exists for AI, not for safe AI. Safety is the feature that enterprise customers pay a premium for today because regulation is uncertain and liability exposure is unclear. The moment regulatory clarity arrives — in either direction — that premium evaporates. If regulations tighten, every AI company will claim safety. If regulations loosen (the Powell trajectory), safety becomes a drag on capability and price.

### Anthropic’s Current Numbers — The Full Picture

As of April 2026, Anthropic has overtaken OpenAI in annualized revenue — a remarkable shift:

Anthropic’s annualized recurring revenue trajectory: $1 billion in January 2025, $5 billion by August 2025, $9 billion by year-end 2025, $14 billion in February 2026, $19 billion in March 2026, surpassing $30 billion in early April 2026. OpenAI in the same period: approximately $13 billion in 2025, approximately $24-25 billion by April 2026 ($2 billion per month).

Anthropic grew 30 times in 15 months, going from an order of magnitude behind OpenAI to surpassing it by 20%. OpenAI’s own growth has been substantial, but compared to Anthropic’s, it is a contrast between steady growth and explosive acceleration. Anthropic has been called the fastest-growing company in history based on this trajectory.

The decisive difference lies in strategic focus: Anthropic consistently targets the enterprise business, while OpenAI has traditionally aimed at end consumers with ChatGPT.

Claude Code was the catalyst. Launched in May 2025, the specialized coding assistant reached $1 billion in run-rate revenue within six months. This represents approximately 20% of Anthropic’s total revenue from a single product vertical. Claude Code now holds 54% of the enterprise coding market, compared to OpenAI’s 21%. Something built by four engineers in ten days had most of its code written by Claude Code itself.

In January 2026, Anthropic released Cowork, extending the same concept from developers to all white-collar roles. Since Cowork’s launch, approximately $2 trillion in market value has been erased from the global SaaS sector.

Enterprise adoption specifics: Anthropic commands 40% of enterprise LLM spending, surpassing OpenAI’s 27% and Google’s 21%, with 85% of revenue from business customers. Over 1,000 enterprise customers spend more than $1 million annually — doubling in just two months. Eight of the Fortune 10 are clients. Ramp’s enterprise spending data shows Anthropic’s share of corporate AI expenditures surged from 10% at the beginning of 2025 to over 65% by February 2026. Seven out of every ten new customers choose Anthropic.

In the enterprise LLM API market, Anthropic’s Claude 3.5 Sonnet captures 32% of the market, compared to OpenAI’s GPT-4o at 25%. Anthropic’s enterprise market share grew from 18% to 29% in 2025. Business customers account for 80% of revenue. In contrast, OpenAI’s enterprise revenue represents only 40% of its overall income.

Consumer share remains dwarfed by ChatGPT (68% market share, approximately 900 million weekly active users) and Google Gemini (18.2%). Claude had approximately 19 million consumer users by Q3 2025. Anthropic treats consumer products as enterprise lead generation rather than primary revenue drivers.

Funding: Anthropic has raised approximately $64 billion in total funding. Its February 2026 Series G brought in $30 billion at a $380 billion post-money valuation, led by GIC and Coatue, with co-leads including D.E. Shaw Ventures, Dragoneer, Founders Fund, ICONIQ, and MGX. Strategic investors Amazon and Google have made massive commitments, with Amazon alone investing up to $8 billion.

Infrastructure: Anthropic has concluded a far-reaching infrastructure agreement with Google and Broadcom covering several gigawatts of next-generation computing capacity. The new TPU capacities are set to come online incrementally from 2027 onward and will be located predominantly in the United States. This is an extension of the commitment announced in November 2025 to invest $50 billion in American AI infrastructure. Anthropic recently agreed to purchase $21 billion of Google’s tensor processing units to gain more control over the hardware it uses so it can reduce computing costs.

Profitability path: Unlike OpenAI, Anthropic projects positive free cash flow by 2027 with potential $17 billion in cash flow by 2028. Anthropic has previously projected gross margins above 70% by 2027. OpenAI has projected gross margins of at least 70% by 2029. OpenAI forecasts losses exceeding $14 billion in 2026.

IPO: Anthropic is evaluating an initial public offering as early as October 2026, which could raise over $60 billion, with its valuation reaching $380 billion.

The shadows: High revenue does not equate to profitability. Exorbitant computing costs mean that AI inference costs are high, and with free users making up 95% of the user base, compute-intensive products have become a profit black hole. While gross margin improved significantly from -94% in 2024, it is expected to be around 40% in 2025 — still 10 percentage points below previous targets. Legal battles with the government: refusing the Pentagon’s request to modify safety restrictions led to being labeled a “supply chain risk.” Although the court temporarily ruled the government exceeded its authority, the trouble is far from over.

### The Fork: Path A, Path B, and Why Path C Does Not Exist

Anthropic faces a binary that maps onto every pattern traced in this chapter:

**Path A: Maintain safety principles.** The Pentagon labels you a supply chain risk. Government contracts go to competitors. Regulated industries follow the government’s lead. Your $30 billion revenue becomes a ceiling, not a floor. You become the Volvo of AI — respected, safe, niche. A security tools company at best, or irrelevant.

**Path B: Compromise safety principles to maintain growth.** You win the Pentagon contracts. You become the full-stack AI infrastructure layer for government and enterprise. Revenue hits $70 billion by 2028 as projected. But now you are Palantir with better PR. The safety research becomes the intellectual veneer on a surveillance-compatible platform. You have won the market and lost the mission.

There is no Path C where you maintain pure safety principles and dominate the market and resist government pressure to weaponize your products. The institutional architecture that Powell built does not allow for that path. The regulatory capture, the legal framework that says corporations can’t dictate how government uses “lawfully acquired” technology, the absence of federal privacy law — all of that forecloses the possibility of a company being both dominant and principled at scale.

The safety positioning is Anthropic’s brand differentiator, but brand is not the same as market structure. If Claude Code is the distribution mechanism that keeps Anthropic competitive, then Anthropic’s survival depends on developer adoption, which depends on capability parity with OpenAI and Google, which creates the exact same incentive gradient that every other AI company faces: ship faster, restrict less, expand use cases. The safety research becomes the thing you fund with the revenue from the thing that undermines the safety research.

The RLHF alignment work, the constitutional AI papers, the responsible scaling policy — these are intellectually serious. But they exist inside a company that needs to grow revenue in a market where the competitors have fewer scruples and deeper pockets. Microsoft backs OpenAI with functionally unlimited capital and enterprise distribution through Azure, Office, and GitHub Copilot. Google has Gemini embedded across Search, Workspace, and Android — billions of existing touchpoints.

The market does not reward being right about safety. It rewards distribution. Schneier has been right about surveillance for twenty years and his congressional testimony got omitted from the committee summary. Anthropic can be right about alignment for twenty years and still lose to whoever ships the better coding assistant with fewer guardrails.

The deeper structural point: the entities doing the most thoughtful work on the risks — Schneier, Anthropic, the grassroots think tanks, the EFF — are all operating inside market and institutional structures that systematically punish the very caution they are advocating. Safety is a cost center in a growth market. Restraint is a competitive disadvantage in an arms race. And the Powell-descended institutional architecture ensures that the regulatory bodies that could turn safety into a market requirement are either captured, defunded, or ignored.

Anthropic saying it won’t allow its technology to be used for mass surveillance while the Pentagon says a private company can’t dictate how the government uses lawfully acquired technology — that is the entire power asymmetry in one exchange. The company with the principles has less power than the institution without them. That is not a safety strategy. That is a negotiating position, and not a strong one.

To compete, Anthropic has to go the Microsoft way — compete in hardware and model compression, be a leader in AI, not just safe AI — because AI is. It is too late for the distinction to hold. The $30 billion in revenue and the infrastructure agreements with Google and Broadcom show they are already doing this — locking in hardware, vertically integrating compute, competing on infrastructure rather than just safety principles. They have become an enterprise platform company. Not a safety research lab. An enterprise platform company with safety research, which is a very different thing.

### The Projection Timeline

**2026-2027: The golden window.** Enterprise revenue compounds. Claude Code dominates. The safety brand is a genuine competitive advantage in regulated industries. IPO happens. Valuation is stratospheric. Everything looks like vindication.

**2027-2028: The infrastructure squeeze.** Both companies project gross margins above 70% by 2027-2029, which would put them closer to publicly traded software firms. If those margins don’t materialize — and the cost structure of responsible AI makes them harder to hit — the public market will punish the stock. Investors don’t care about alignment research when margins compress.

**2028-2030: The Pentagon fork.** The government pressure doesn’t go away. It intensifies as AI becomes more central to military and intelligence operations. The legal battles with the government over safety restrictions are far from over. Anthropic either capitulates on defense applications or watches competitors absorb those contracts and the revenue they generate.

**The long tail.** If Anthropic maintains its principles and loses the government and defense market, it becomes a security tools company — high-integrity, respected, niche. Profitable, maybe, but not the world-shaping force its founders intended. The safety research continues. Papers get published. The alignment problem gets better understood. And the actual deployment of AI at civilizational scale happens inside companies that absorbed Anthropic’s talent and ideas without its constraints.

Just like General Magic. The company died. The vision lived. But it lived inside Apple, Google, and eBay — not inside the company that held the original vision.

**The cruelest version of this future:** Anthropic’s safety research becomes the intellectual foundation for whatever “responsible AI framework” the captured regulatory state eventually mandates — a framework written by the think tanks Powell’s infrastructure built, enforced by the agencies those think tanks staffed, and designed to protect incumbents while wearing the language of Anthropic’s mission like a skin suit.

The $30 billion in revenue buys them time. It does not change the underlying dynamics. AI safety as a competitive differentiator works exactly until the moment it conflicts with a customer’s operational requirements — and when your customer is the U.S. Department of Defense, that moment arrives with the force of the state behind it.

-----

## VI. The First-Mover Trap in Democratic Movements

The General Magic / Anthropic / early-ChatGPT analogy applies with equal force to every major progressive counter-movement of the last two decades. They all follow the same pattern: enormous initial activation energy — the equivalent of OpenAI’s ChatGPT moment — massive cultural resonance, then market dispersal. The energy dissipates across fragmented channels, gets co-opted by institutional actors who absorb the language without the substance, or simply burns out against the sustained, funded, patient counter-strategy that Powell’s heirs have been running for fifty years.

### Occupy as First-Mover

Occupy Wall Street is the textbook case. It generated enormous initial attention capital by reframing the national conversation around inequality with a single sticky concept: “We are the 99%.” But it had no governance structure, no institutional capture strategy, no long-term product roadmap. It was a proof of concept that never shipped a production version.

Occupy is the equivalent of OpenAI’s first-to-market concept — quick money, unable to sustain long term. It benefits only from initial inception with no real long-term market strategy. Same as Anthropic without Claude Code — without a durable distribution mechanism, without a product that embeds itself into daily workflows, that creates switching costs, that builds compounding network effects — first-mover advantage is just a head start on a track where your competitors have better shoes. Occupy had no Claude Code equivalent. No institutional mechanism that embedded its analysis into the ongoing operations of governance, media, or law. It produced awareness without infrastructure.

The same pattern repeats: Women’s March (2017), March for Our Lives (2018), Black Lives Matter as a decentralized network. Massive initial activation energy, enormous cultural resonance, then market dispersal — the energy dissipates, gets co-opted, or burns out.

### Tufekci’s Three-Capacity Framework

Zeynep Tufekci, in *Twitter and Tear Gas: The Power and Fragility of Networked Protest*, identified the paradox with precision. Social media gave movements unprecedented power to scale. The 1963 March on Washington took a decade of sustained movement-building and six months of organizing to execute. The Egyptian revolution of 2011 filled Tahrir Square in days. But this speed comes at a cost that is not immediately visible: the hard, slow work of movement-building in the pre-digital era had a generative quality. It built what Tufekci calls capacity — the organizational infrastructure, the collective decision-making ability, the strategic flexibility required to translate protest into durable political change. When legislators looked at the March on Washington, they saw not just numbers but logistics, coordination, and the institutional muscle to follow through. Digital movements signal numbers. They do not necessarily signal capacity.

Tufekci distinguished three kinds of capacity that determine whether a movement achieves lasting change:

1. **Narrative capacity** — the ability to change the conversation and introduce new frames into public discourse.
1. **Disruptive capacity** — the ability to interrupt the normal functioning of economic or political institutions.
1. **Electoral and institutional capacity** — the ability to reward or punish elected officials at the ballot box and to engage with the legislative process that produces binding law.

Social media excels at narrative capacity. It is adequate at disruptive capacity, though the disruption tends to be temporary. It is structurally weak at electoral and institutional capacity — precisely the capacity that converts protest into policy.

Occupy achieved extraordinary narrative success — “We are the 99%” entered the American political vocabulary permanently. But as research published in *Humanities and Social Sciences Communications* documented, Occupy’s deliberate rejection of formal leadership, its refusal to articulate specific legislative demands, and its avoidance of engagement with institutional politics meant that when the encampments were cleared, the movement had no mechanism for deciding what to do next. Tufekci called this tactical freeze — the inability of digitally organized movements to adapt their tactics when circumstances change, because they lack the internal deliberative infrastructure that slower, harder, pre-digital organizing would have built. Kreiss and Tufekci, writing together, described Occupy as a movement where the fullest expression of individual identity and a denial of engagement with the structured demands of institutional politics were its very form of politics. A Brookings analysis concluded: Occupy organized large rallies but failed to translate its activism into a broader political movement, and the absence of clear objectives was central to that failure.

Compare this to the civil rights movement, which took the opposite approach with lethal strategic precision. The sit-ins, the Freedom Rides, the marches were not spontaneous expressions of outrage. They were designed to produce specific legislative outcomes. The Birmingham Campaign targeted specific Jim Crow laws. The March on Washington was organized around a specific demand: the passage of what would become the Civil Rights Act of 1964. Andrews and Gaby’s research in the *Sociological Forum* documented how local protest efforts exerted indirect influence on federal policy — not by generating attention alone, but by building coalitions between civil rights organizations, sympathetic legislators, and the Kennedy administration, who together crafted the legislative response. The movement’s power came not from its visibility but from the organizational capacity that visibility signaled.

The Tea Party movement, beginning in 2009, understood this with ruthless clarity. As Tufekci observed, it sought electoral capacity from the outset and achieved it. Within two years, Tea Party-aligned candidates had won enough congressional seats to reshape the Republican Party’s legislative agenda. The Tea Party was not larger than Occupy. It was not more morally compelling. It was more strategically literate about the mechanisms that convert political energy into binding law.

Evgeny Morozov, in *The Net Delusion*, posed the question: whether the publicity gains from digital organizing are worth the organizational losses that traditional activist structures suffer as people turn away from conventional and proven forms of activism. Pew Research Center data answered with uncomfortable symmetry: roughly eight in ten Americans believe social media are effective at raising awareness, but a nearly identical share — 79% — say social media distract people from issues that are truly important, and 76% say these platforms make people believe they are making a difference when they are not.

### The Powell Model as Platform Strategy

Powell’s memo was essentially a platform play. He didn’t build a single product. He built an ecosystem: think tanks that produce intellectual product (Heritage, AEI, Cato), legal infrastructure that translates that product into judicial outcomes (Federalist Society, Institute for Legal Reform), media distribution channels that normalize those outcomes (talk radio, Fox News, the broader right-wing digital ecosystem), and a political fundraising apparatus that creates durable switching costs for elected officials (PACs, dark money networks, Citizens United).

Each component reinforces the others. A Heritage policy paper becomes a Federalist Society legal brief becomes a Supreme Court opinion becomes a Fox News talking point becomes a campaign ad. That is a flywheel. That is compounding returns on a fifty-year investment.

The grassroots counter-movement has nothing resembling this. EFF wins a case, Brennan Center publishes a report, a citizen journalist goes viral for 48 hours, a state passes a data broker registration law — and none of these events compound into the next. There is no flywheel. There is no ecosystem. There are isolated products competing against a platform.

### The Dove-vs-Hawk Structural Problem

The Democratic Party’s structural problem is not intelligence — there are brilliant people in its orbit. It is that the party functions as a coalition manager rather than a movement architect. It mediates between competing constituencies (labor, environmentalists, civil rights groups, tech-friendly moderates, progressives) rather than building unified institutional power the way Powell prescribed for the right.

The result is a party that campaigns on inspiration and governs on compromise, which in a system already captured by corporate interests means governing on corporate terms while using progressive language. The Affordable Care Act is a perfect example: a progressive-sounding framework built on insurance industry architecture. The party fights the hawk by trying to be a slightly faster dove — same species, same rules of engagement, same sky.

The Powell model didn’t play by existing rules. It rewrote the rules by capturing the institutions that set them. The Democratic counter-strategy has been to work within those captured institutions and hope the rules still mean what they used to mean. That is the equivalent of a startup trying to compete with a platform monopoly by making a better product within the monopoly’s app store — you are always one policy change away from irrelevance.

U.S. political institutions are weak, largely because they are undemocratic. Members of the Senate over-represent the white rural population, presidents can win the election without winning the popular vote, and the Supreme Court routinely rules against popular will. U.S. political systems also rely on norms that commentators and legislators have wholly jettisoned in the 21st century. The tradition of civil resistance was largely forgotten among American progressives after the 1970s, with the rise of the Reagan alignment. American organizing has operated on the assumption that our political institutions and processes will work. That assumption is the dove’s fatal error. The premise of civil resistance is that ordinary people, not just politicians, have the means to enforce democratic outcomes. By refusing to comply or cooperate with unjust decisions, citizens can deny undemocratic leaders the support they need. But that requires mass participation, and mass participation requires awareness, and awareness requires media infrastructure, and media infrastructure is captured or algorithmically fragmented.

The grassroots counter-institutions — EFF (founded 1990), Brennan Center (1995), the various AI policy institutes (mostly post-2020) — are decades behind the Powell curve. They are building a fire station while the house is already engulfed. The Trump administration’s sharp shift away from a decades-long U.S. leadership role in support of democracy includes consequential cuts in U.S. foreign assistance for civil society, independent media, and other pro-democracy actors globally. The funding infrastructure for democratic counter-movements is being actively dismantled while the surveillance infrastructure is being expanded.

Dan Gillmor, co-founder of the News Co/Lab at Arizona State University, commented: “Governments (and their corporate partners) are broadly using technology to create a surveillance state, and what amounts to law by unaccountable black-box algorithm, far beyond anything Orwell imagined. But this can only happen in a society that can’t be bothered to protect liberty — or is easily led/stampeded into relinquishing it — and that is happening in more and more of the Western democracies.”

Richard Stallman’s foundational observation connects this to the surveillance architecture: “To make journalism and democracy safe, we must limit the accumulation of data that is easily accessible to the state.” But limiting that accumulation requires legislative action, which requires political power, which requires organizing, which requires communication infrastructure that is already surveilled. It is a bootstrapping problem with no clean entry point.

The AI acceleration makes it worse, not better. Each year the counter-movement delays building durable infrastructure, the surveillance apparatus becomes exponentially more capable of identifying and neutralizing that movement before it reaches critical mass. Schneier’s framework, Anthropic’s safety research, EFF’s investigations — all of it is intellectually correct and structurally inadequate. The counter-movements are feature competitors in a platform war, operating on a timeline that is structurally too slow against an adversary that has been compounding institutional power for over fifty years and now has AI-augmented surveillance as a force multiplier.

The rebel faction metaphor is not dramatic. It is descriptive.

The research on social media’s political effects confirms this trajectory. Social media can have a weakening effect on strong democratic regimes, an intensifying effect on strong authoritarian regimes, a radicalizing effect on weak democratic regimes, and a destabilizing effect on weak authoritarian regimes. The U.S. is arguably a weak democratic regime at this point — which means the same tools that citizen journalists use are simultaneously radicalizing and fragmenting the polity. The tools of citizen resistance become the vectors of state counter-response.

An internet pioneer and technology developer predicted: “My expectation is that by 2030, as much as 75% of the world’s population will be enslaved by artificial intelligence-based surveillance systems developed in China and exported around the world. These systems will keep every citizen under observation 24 hours a day, seven days a week, monitoring their every action.”

The honest analytical conclusion: the grassroots counter-movement — citizen journalism, think tanks, digital rights organizations — represents the only viable vector of resistance, but it is fighting with structural disadvantages that are not merely tactical but constitutional. The system is not broken. It is operating as the Powell Memo designed it to operate.

-----

## VII. The Sovereign Algorithm’s Contractor

If the Powell Memo built the institutional architecture of capture, and the data broker loophole built the commercial infrastructure of surveillance, and Schneier diagnosed the crisis with precision that the system was structurally designed to ignore, and Anthropic attempted to build a responsible alternative inside a market that punishes responsibility, and the democratic counter-movements remain trapped in the first-mover cycle of activation without institutional capture — then Palantir Technologies is the entity that fused all of these threads into a single operational system at the heart of the state.

Palantir was co-founded in 2003 by Peter Thiel — a venture capitalist, PayPal co-founder, early Facebook investor, and one of the most consequential political donors of the twenty-first century — with early funding from In-Q-Tel, the CIA’s venture capital arm. The company’s software — Gotham for intelligence and defense, Foundry for commercial and government operations — integrates disparate data streams into unified analytical platforms. Its original purpose was counterterrorism. Its current purpose is everything.

### The Numbers

In 2025, Palantir’s federal contracts nearly doubled, rising to $970.5 million. Multi-year contract ceilings awarded in 2025 alone total over $13.7 billion. That is $84.26 per taxpayer if fully exercised. Revenue has grown 6.5 times in six years. After decelerating to 17% growth in 2023, growth re-accelerated dramatically in 2024-2025, coinciding with massive new federal contract awards. FY2025 revenue hit $4.48 billion — up 56% in a single year. The company crossed $1 billion in quarterly revenue for the first time in the second quarter. Twenty-two years after its founding, Palantir’s software runs inside the CIA, the Pentagon, ICE, the IRS, the CDC, the Army, and dozens of other agencies.

Palantir is a data analytics company and defense contractor that sells surveillance technology to the US government and allied countries, as well as to the private sector. It has won $1.9 billion in US contracts since 2008. CEO Alex Karp received $6.8 billion in compensation in 2024, making him the highest-paid public company CEO that year.

OpenAI, founded in 2015, is valued at roughly $852 billion after its early-2026 fundraise. Anthropic, founded in 2021, is valued at $380 billion after its February 2026 Series G. Palantir operates in a different category — not a foundation model company but the integration layer, the company that takes data from everywhere and makes it operationally useful for the state. It is the connective tissue between the data broker ecosystem and government power.

### The Contracts: The Operational Architecture of the Sovereign Algorithm

**U.S. Army — $10 billion over a decade.** The largest single award. This multi-year contract makes Palantir the backbone data platform for the U.S. Army’s modernization strategy, integrating their Foundry, TITAN, and Vantage products across Army operations. What it does: aggregates sensor data, logistics, personnel readiness, and intelligence into a single operational picture. Why it matters: this is a generational lock-in. Once the Army’s data infrastructure runs on Palantir, switching costs become effectively infinite. The agreement creates a “comprehensive framework for the Army’s future software and data needs” that provides the government with purchasing flexibility and removes contract-related fees and procurement timelines. It consolidates 75 total contracts into one enterprise deal.

**Project Maven — evolved from experiment to permanent infrastructure.** Project Maven began in 2017 as a Pentagon effort to use AI to help analysts process massive volumes of surveillance imagery and video, but it has since evolved into a broader military intelligence and targeting platform that fuses data from multiple sensors to identify objects, assess threats, and support operational decisions. The Department of Defense is expanding its use of AI by formalizing Palantir’s Maven system as a long-term program, signaling a shift from experimental tools to operational infrastructure.

Palantir’s work on Maven has expanded through multiple awards: a five-year, $480 million Army contract in 2024, a roughly $100 million follow-on expansion later that year, and a 2025 contract modification valued at up to $795 million for continued system support and software licensing. The latest move does not replace those contracts. Instead, it builds on earlier efforts by expanding Maven from a narrower intelligence program into a broader, Pentagon-backed capability intended for long-term, department-wide use.

**ICE — ImmigrationOS.** A $30 million no-bid contract to build an “Immigration Lifecycle Operating System,” referred to as ImmigrationOS, to track self-deportations, help select targets for arrests, and create an “Immigration Lifecycle Process” to increase the efficiency of deportations. Palantir has been a contractor for ICE since 2011, but this contract — awarded in April 2025 — represents a qualitative shift: an AI platform that identifies noncitizens and tracks deportations. Palantir’s work with ICE comes as President Trump has worked to make good on his promise to carry out the largest mass deportation operation in history.

This is the system that processes human beings into the categories that determine whether they are inside or outside — the algorithmic sovereign decision applied to immigration enforcement. This is, in the language of “Jus Algoritmi,” the production of homo sacer by algorithmic means.

**IRS — unified API layer.** Palantir employees were embedded at the IRS alongside DOGE (Department of Government Efficiency) staff to build a “mega API” at the IRS that could access data from across the agency. The tech outlet Wired separately reported on this effort. In September 2025, the Treasury Department announced that it had awarded a contract to Palantir to create a “unified API layer” — formalizing what had begun as an ad hoc DOGE-driven project.

What it does: creates a single access point to all taxpayer data — Social Security numbers, tax returns, employment records, bank information, and filing history. What they access: every tax return filed in the United States.

Why it matters: multiple members of Congress allege this violates Internal Revenue Code Sections 6103 and 7213A — post-Watergate laws specifically enacted to prevent the weaponization of taxpayer data. Senator Ron Wyden, Representative Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez, Senator Elizabeth Warren, and Senator Edward Markey have formally demanded answers from Palantir CEO Alex Karp.

Wyden said he’s still not convinced Palantir is a trusted contractor. “Palantir is one of the companies making a lot of money out of this,” he told The Hill. “There are privacy problems with what they’re doing. I mean, this has been a great, as I call it, a great harvest for these kind of technology operations and virtually no accountability.”

One former agency official said it wasn’t surprising to see the increased use of Palantir at ICE, given its capabilities and the administration’s relationships with the company. DOGE wanted to use the company’s Foundry tool to deal with legacy technology challenges that had existed for decades. The IRS had already been using Palantir for several years for fraud detection work and work done under the Office of Criminal Investigations. While the agency had been focused on lessening its dependence on antiquated programming languages like COBOL, DOGE was highly interested in improving the agency’s approach to the “data layer.” While there were certainly concerns about vendor lock-in, other companies are also trying to make government agencies more dependent on their software.

The interest in Palantir stemmed from the Trump administration’s more aggressive posture.

**Israel — targeting databases.** After announcing a “strategic partnership” with Israel in January 2024, Palantir’s involvement in Gaza and the occupied West Bank expanded considerably. Using a mix of intercepted communications, satellite material, and other digital data sources, Palantir began integrating these inputs to help produce targeting databases — effectively, “kill lists” — for the Israeli military. It has also cultivated close ties with US security agencies, particularly during the Trump administration, and has worked with Israel in its occupation of the West Bank and what critics describe as genocide in Gaza.

The company drew heavily on the expertise of former members of Israel’s cyber-intelligence unit, 8200.

According to Amnesty International: “Palantir has a track record of flagrantly disregarding international law and standards, both in the violations of the human rights of migrants in the United States, to which it risks contributing to, and its ongoing supply of artificial intelligence (AI) products and services to the Israeli military and intelligence services that are linked to Israel’s ongoing genocide in Gaza.”

Activists have organized protests against the company’s work for the Israeli military, as well as its developing role at U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

**DOD as primary revenue source.** DOD alone accounts for the majority of Palantir’s government revenue. The company’s federal portfolio has mushroomed under the Trump administration’s second term, but it is also facing growing scrutiny over its work with the administration.

### The Connection to Schneier’s DOGE Testimony

Bruce Schneier’s June 2025 testimony before the House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform identified the final piece of this architecture. He stated that DOGE’s affiliates have spread across government, that they are “still exfiltrating massive US databases, processing them with AI and offering them to private companies such as Palantir.”

Access to Americans’ data could give private companies significant advantages in training AI systems and in setting business strategy. Without proper oversight, this access could lead to private companies profiting from sensitive information or foreign governments exploiting vulnerabilities.

What Palantir represents in the architecture of capture is the final integration: the point at which corporate infrastructure, state power, and algorithmic sovereignty become indistinguishable. The data brokers harvest the raw material. DOGE consolidates it from inside the government. Palantir refines it into operational platforms. The state consumes it. And the citizen whose data flows through this pipeline has no standing, no visibility into the process, and no meaningful mechanism of appeal.

The sovereign algorithm does not merely advise the state. It becomes the state’s operating system. And the company that built it answers to its shareholders, not to the demos.

-----

## VIII. The Manifesto: From Powell’s Confidential Memo to Palantir’s Public Declaration

On April 20, 2026, Palantir posted a 22-point summary of *The Technological Republic: Hard Power, Soft Belief, and the Future of the West* — co-authored by CEO Alex Karp and head of corporate affairs Nicholas Zamiska — to its X account. The post accumulated over 32 million views.

*The Technological Republic* is a #1 New York Times bestseller. NPR named it a staff top pick for 2025. Barnes & Noble listed it among the best business books of the year. George Will wrote in *The Washington Post*: “Not since Allan Bloom’s astonishingly successful 1987 book *The Closing of the American Mind* — more than one million copies sold — has there been a cultural critique as sweeping as Karp’s.” Niall Ferguson called it “a stirring manifesto for a new Manhattan Project for the AI Age.” The *Wall Street Journal* called it “ambitious, dense, cultured… nuanced, caveated, largely compelling, and reassuringly humble.” *Wired* called it “a surprisingly readable polemic that skewers Silicon Valley for insufficient patriotism.” The *Washington Post* described it as “as clear and bracing as reveille.” The *Times of London* called it “the AI manifesto inspiring Keir Starmer’s government.” The *New York Times Magazine* noted that it “argues for a return to the values of the early Cold War, when technology, culture and national defense were united in common purpose.”

The book is billed as “a passionate call for the West to wake up to our new reality” and promises to “lift the veil on Palantir and its broader political project from the inside.”

### The 22 Points

The manifesto’s core arguments, as posted to X:

1. “Silicon Valley owes a moral debt to the country that made its rise possible. The engineering elite of Silicon Valley has an affirmative obligation to participate in the defense of the nation.”
1. “We must rebel against the tyranny of the apps. Is the iPhone our greatest creative if not crowning achievement as a civilization? The object has changed our lives, but it may also now be limiting and constraining our sense of the possible.”
1. “Free email is not enough. The decadence of a culture or civilization, and indeed its ruling class, will be forgiven only if that culture is capable of delivering economic growth and security for the public.”
1. “The limits of soft power, of soaring rhetoric alone, have been exposed. The ability of free and democratic societies to prevail requires something more than moral appeal. It requires hard power, and hard power in this century will be built on software.”
1. “The question is not whether A.I. weapons will be built; it is who will build them and for what purpose. Our adversaries will not pause to indulge in theatrical debates about the merits of developing technologies with critical military and national security applications. They will proceed.”
1. “National service should be a universal duty. We should, as a society, seriously consider moving away from an all-volunteer force and only fight the next war if everyone shares in the risk and the cost.”
1. “If a U.S. Marine asks for a better rifle, we should build it; and the same goes for software.”

The manifesto asserts that “not all cultures are equal. Some have proved middling, and worse, regressive and harmful.” It calls for the U.S. to renew a shared culture for the “country’s continued survival and cohesion,” arguing that “the old means of manufacturing a nation, the civic rituals of an educational system, mandatory service in national defense, religion, a shared language, and a thriving and free press have all but been dismantled or withered from neglect and abuse.”

In a 2025 NYT DealBook Summit interview titled on YouTube “Alex Karp Reveals Why Palantir Is the Most Dangerous Company on Earth,” Karp stated: “No one would listen to the superiority of our ideas if our ability to organize in violence was inferior… Every single person in the world believes this outside of the faculty of Harvard. And certainly our adversaries know to be true.” He argued that the rule of law and meritocracy are only possible when backed by military superiority, which in this century is built on AI and software.

He explained his priorities: “I care about two issues: I care about immigration and reestablishing the deterrent capacity of America… On those two issues, this president [Trump] has performed.”

He has explicitly stated he is “proud” of supporting Israel’s war efforts and acknowledged a “strategic partnership” with Israel’s Ministry of Defense for “war-related missions” since early 2024.

He shared how being “massively dyslexic” shaped his leadership style: “If you are massively dyslexic, you cannot play a playbook… we learn to think freely… I process in a way that has very little to do with what anyone else thinks.”

### The Critical Response

Al Jazeera described the manifesto as “an AI-driven threat to humanity’s existence” and “technofascism,” noting that “the publication of what appears to be a 22-point manifesto comes at a critical time for Palantir, which faces global criticism for its support of US President Donald Trump’s controversial immigration crackdown and its backing of the Israeli military’s actions in Gaza and the occupied West Bank.”

*The Nation* called it “a self-serving broadside steeped in oligarchic hubris and authoritarian nihilism.” The review continued: “Under his dystopian vision, Palantir would thrive and grow because safety and security are conflated with hard power — i.e., technological and military shows of force. Basic norms of international relations will be discarded entirely — a process now sent into overdrive by the Trump White House.” And: “He has never experienced the horrors of war firsthand. Like many Silicon Valley billionaires, he travels with a personal security force that ensures his personal safety at every level — but he’s happy to endanger the lives of others if it justifies spending more money on Palantir’s burgeoning defense portfolio. Like any other war profiteer, Karp will simply keep padding his bottom line, and will never be compelled by law to fight and die in a needless war because a billionaire wanted to make more money.”

Dave Karpf, associate professor at George Washington University’s School of Media & Public Affairs, wrote in TechPolicy.Press: “There is nothing in this ‘America First’-sounding manifesto that wouldn’t fit comfortably within a modern-day Mussolini regime.” He added: “It takes a certain audacity to survey the US landscape in 2026 and assert that ‘elites’ are intolerant to religious belief. Christian Nationalists have taken over much of the government. Likewise, the rejection of pluralism and the smug assertion that some cultures are good and others are middling, regressive, and harmful is shockingly regressive.” He noted that when he read the book, “my reaction was, ‘this book should have been a tweet.’ It now seems Palantir agrees.” He described the manifesto as “as subtle as a MAGA hat” and concluded: “Time and again, Karp exhibits the moral compass and complexity of a Bond villain.”

Engadget described it as reading “like the ramblings of a comic book villain.”

*Fortune* noted that “the point that drew the most scrutiny was the authors’ claim that some cultures have proved ‘middling, and worse, regressive and harmful,’” particularly given that Palantir provides technology to ICE and recently built ImmigrationOS.

One analysis framed the manifesto within the concept of “techno-sovereignty” — noting that “Alex Karp isn’t just selling software; he is selling a worldview. In his manifesto, Karp argues that the West’s ‘peace-time’ mindset is a liability. By framing the integration of software into the ‘kill chain’ of national defense as a moral obligation for the engineering elite, he is shifting Western defense policy priorities.”

### The Through-Line: Powell to Karp

Read the Powell Memo and *The Technological Republic* side by side. The through-line is direct:

Powell, 1971: American business is under attack. The engineering of political power — through universities, media, courts, and legislatures — is a moral obligation of the corporate class. The regulatory state must be weakened. Corporate interests must capture the institutions of democratic governance. Political power must be assiduously cultivated. Television and textbooks must be kept under constant surveillance. The judiciary is perhaps the most important instrument for social, economic, and political change.

Karp, 2025: Silicon Valley has failed its moral obligation to the nation. Hard power must be built on software. AI weapons must be built by American companies. The limits of soft power have been exposed. Technology companies must participate in defense. National service should be universal. Some cultures are regressive and harmful. No one would listen to the superiority of our ideas if our ability to organize in violence was inferior.

Powell called for corporate capture of democratic institutions to protect free enterprise. Karp calls for the fusion of Silicon Valley and the military-intelligence apparatus to project hard power. Powell wanted to monitor textbooks. Karp builds the systems that monitor populations. Powell wanted to shape the judiciary. Karp builds the platforms that the judiciary cannot yet govern. Powell’s project created the regulatory vacuum. Karp’s company fills it — with software that tracks immigrants, consolidates taxpayer data, identifies bombing targets, and processes the raw material of democratic citizenship through algorithms that no elected body controls and no affected person can appeal.

The Powell Memo was a confidential strategy document for the Chamber of Commerce. *The Technological Republic* is a New York Times bestseller posted as a 22-point manifesto on a platform with 32 million views. The quiet part is now the loud part. The institutional capture is so complete that the beneficiaries no longer need to conceal the architecture. They can publish it, promote it, receive praise from George Will and Niall Ferguson, and profit from it — while the company simultaneously operates ImmigrationOS for ICE, embeds employees in the IRS alongside DOGE staff, holds a $10 billion Army contract, produces targeting databases for the Israeli military, and processes the data that Schneier warned Congress had almost certainly already been compromised by foreign adversaries.

The architecture is no longer hidden. Its architects are posting the blueprints on social media and selling them at Barnes & Noble. The machine that ate democracy is publishing its own user manual.

-----

## IX. The Handoff to Jus Algoritmi

“Jus Algoritmi” begins where this chapter ends — with the collapse already underway, the citizen already dissolved, the homo sacer already being produced by algorithmic means.

It traces the mechanisms: the cubicle that made you visible at work through Jeremy Bentham’s panopticon reimagined as corporate architecture, through Elizabeth Anderson’s private government, through Robert Propst’s Action Office gutted of its autonomy and shrunk into the surveillance container that Mike Judge captured in *Office Space*; the profile that made you visible socially through Mark Zuckerberg’s philosophical claim that maintaining separate public and private identities is “a lack of integrity,” through the context collapse that danah boyd and Alice Marwick named, through the destruction of Erving Goffman’s backstage that Helen Nissenbaum’s framework of contextual integrity was built to protect; the AI that made your inner life visible by managing your calendar, health, relationships, finances, sleep, mood, fertility, medication, and memory inside a single interface that collapses every context Nissenbaum identified as the architecture of privacy; the psychopolitics that Byung-Chul Han describes in *Psychopolitics: Neoliberalism and New Technologies of Power* — the shift from discipline to achievement, from “you must” to “you can,” from exploitation to self-exploitation, from the subject to the project, from biopolitics to psychopolitics, from the prohibition to the positive; and the algorithmic sovereignty that processes you into or out of functional citizenship through what John Cheney-Lippold named *jus algoritmi* — the right of the algorithm, where moment by moment, the citizenship assigned to us, and thus the rights we may claim and the laws we are subject to, are changing, rendering us effectively stateless as the concrete rights we have been accustomed to flicker and shift.

But those mechanisms did not emerge from nowhere. They emerged from the architecture described in these four parts — from a memo that became a movement that became an institutional capture that became a regulatory vacuum that became a commercial marketplace for personal data that became a surveillance apparatus that the state could purchase without a warrant that became the operating system of the state itself through DOGE’s consolidation and Palantir’s integration. Each stage made the next possible. Each stage raised the cost of reversal. And at each stage, the people who understood what was happening — Schneier with his diagnosis, Anthropic with its safety research, the EFF with its investigations, the Brennan Center with its legal analyses, the citizen journalists with their documentation — produced brilliant work that the system was structurally designed to ignore.

The policy debt that “Jus Algoritmi” describes — the compounding gap between the legal fiction of the autonomous citizen and the lived reality of the algorithmically constituted subject — did not begin when AI entered the bedroom. It began when Lewis Powell mailed an eight-page memo to the Chamber of Commerce on August 23, 1971. Every year since then has been a year of accruing interest. Every blocked regulation, every captured agency, every weakened privacy framework, every delayed legislative session, every congressional hearing where the security expert’s testimony was omitted from the summary has added to the principal. And the interest is compound.

The Hungarian-British physicist Leo Szilard, who conceived the nuclear chain reaction and then spent the rest of his life trying to prevent its use, once observed that the problem was never the technology. The problem was always the gap between the speed of technical progress and the speed of political wisdom. That gap is wider now than at any point since Szilard’s era. AI development operates on a timeline of months. Democratic institutions operate on a timeline of years, sometimes decades. The people who benefit from this gap understand it intuitively, which is why they spend so aggressively to maintain it. They do not need to win the argument permanently. They need only delay meaningful oversight until the integration is irreversible.

Palantir’s manifesto completes the arc. Where Powell wrote a confidential strategy document urging corporations to capture democratic institutions to protect free enterprise, Karp publishes a bestselling book arguing that Silicon Valley has a moral obligation to build the hard power infrastructure of the state — and then posts the summary as a 22-point manifesto to 32 million viewers while his company operates the Immigration Lifecycle Operating System, embeds employees in the IRS, holds a $10 billion Army contract, and produces targeting databases for military operations abroad. The quiet part became the loud part because the capture is so complete that silence is no longer necessary. The architecture is visible. The architects have signed their names. The beneficiaries file quarterly earnings reports. The contractors post manifestos on social media. The operators testify before Congress — and the Congress does not include their testimony in the summary.

The question that “Jus Algoritmi” poses — whether the seam between algorithmic colonization and democratic self-governance can be forced open before it closes — cannot be answered without understanding how the seam was narrowed in the first place. That is what these four parts have attempted to provide: not the story of the collapse, but the blueprint of the machine that made the collapse structurally inevitable.

The machine is not invisible. It never was. Powell left his name on the memo. Heritage left its name on Project 2025. Fog Data Science left its name on the police contracts. Palantir left its name on ImmigrationOS, on the IRS unified API, on the Army’s $10 billion backbone, on the targeting databases, and on a 22-point manifesto posted to social media for anyone to read.

The debt is coming due. The ledger is open. The entries are legible to anyone willing to read them.

What follows — in “Jus Algoritmi” and beyond it — is the question of whether the democratic system can read its own ledger before the balance exceeds its capacity to pay. The instruments remain. The vote remains. The right to organize, to petition, to walk into a congressional office and insist — not as a data point, not as a project, not as a profile, but as a citizen — that the law recognize what has been done and protect what has not yet been lost. Those instruments are real. They function. They have not yet been algorithmically captured in the way that attention, desire, and deliberation have been. An algorithm can shape what you want to vote for. It cannot cast the vote. An algorithm can manipulate what you believe about a policy. It cannot write the policy. An algorithm can suppress your visibility on a platform. It cannot prevent you from walking into a congressional office.

But Palantir’s contract with the Army runs for ten years. Schneier’s warnings have been validated for twenty years without producing structural change. The GDPR is being hollowed out. The data broker loophole remains open. The Powell flywheel has been compounding for over fifty years. And Karp’s manifesto tells you exactly what comes next — not in code, not in confidence, not in a memo to a friend at the Chamber of Commerce, but in a #1 New York Times bestseller endorsed by George Will, Niall Ferguson, and the *Wall Street Journal*.

The architecture of capture is complete. Its architects are no longer hiding. They are publishing.

And no one has begun to calculate the cost.

...to be continued
